Chapter 1 - First Cut and Planting the Seeds

One step at a time.
That was what you kept telling yourself anyway.
Step by step, you pushed the humming and thrumming gas guzzler of a lawnmower through the thick grass of your current employer's lawn.
It didn't help matters though that the grass was tall enough to reach past your ankles, or that the mower had a grassbox that seemed to fill up in no time at all and needed emptying every couple of minutes.
It especially didn't help that it was one of the hottest days of the summer so far or that you felt like an ant under a magnifying glass.
Yet here you were, sweating away under the glaring sunlight for essentially peanuts...
Your name is Anon, and you are currently in the process of hiring yourself out around town as a general handyman, gardener etc.
Today you are working on the garden of a large home at the edge of town, it's the biggest job that you've actually taken on to date but since you need every last cent you can get your hands on right now...
With a sigh you cut the power, and once more set about emptying the little plastic box of grass cuttings into the waste bag provided.
The sun was beating down on you mercilessly now and your shirt was already soaked.
By your estimate, the large garden you had been tasked with tidying up would take all of today for the grass, tomorrow for the bushes and shrubbery, the day after for the pool (yes, they had a pool), and possibly another day should they want you to do anything about the guttering or other odd jobs a big property like this inevitably had hanging around...
It was in this moment of regret, when you truly started to second guess your decision to take on this job, that things took a turn...

Grumbling over your soon to be misspent youth labouring instead of more fun activities, you strip off your shirt and toss it aside.
You had already slathered yourself that morning with sunblock just in case so you didn't have to worry too much about sunburn.
Before you could start the mower back up and continue however, a call from behind drew your attention.
"Wait a moment Anon!  Don't switch it on yet!"
You recognise the voice as belonging to your employer, Mrs Fearson.
She was on her way over to you holding a little tray, a pair of wobbling glasses balanced precariously on top filled with what looked like some lemonade.
With a sigh you wait for her to make her way over, enjoying the break and the slight warm breeze that had started up from behind.
Despite the heat she was almost completely covered up, giving you the impression that either the heat really didn't bother her at all or she wasn't all that confident in wearing something more seasonal.
She was a bit shorter than you, unusual considering that she was actually an anthro mountain lion, and reached up only as far as your chin.
She was in her late forties as far as you knew, and was actually the mom of a guy you used to know in high school, but that was the limit of your knowledge of her.
She was wearing a white wide brimmed summer hat, a large pair of round lensed sunglasses, a flowery and puffy summer top with baggy sleeves that cut off at the elbows and a pair of light pants.
When finally she reached you she seemed to be a bit flustered, huffing slightly and struggling to balance the tray.
"I thought you might be in need of a cold drink and a little break, can't have you making yourself ill on your first day after all!"
You couldn't make out much of her face except for her furry and whiskered muzzle thanks to the glasses, but her smile looked genuine enough which was a pleasant change to most of the others who had hired you so far.
Gratefully, you accept the proffered drink and take a swig, relishing the icy fizz and the sense of relief that came with it.
"Thanks Mrs Fearson, much appreciated!"
As she sipped from her own, she waved her large furry hand at you and smiled.
"Oh don't call me that!  It makes me sound old...  Just call me Jill okay?"
A bit informal, but you weren't going to argue.
"Ok... Jill, thanks."
She stood there and waited as you drank, shuffling her feet about in the grass and looking just about everywhere except your bare sweaty chest.
You had never been all that much to look at in the physique department, but prolonged manual labour had buffed you out just a touch, so you didn't automatically figure that she might be trying to avoid checking you out.
Huh... you didn't think anthros did that sort of thing to humans...
Feeling an awkward silence growing, you try and kick up a conversation.
"So... this is quite the place you got here, must be hard keeping it all maintained by yourself."
She smiled, a touch of sadness pulled at the corners however.
"Thank you, it is a bit of a struggle I admit, but my son Chad still lives here with me most of the time and he helps... or he's supposed to anyway."
Chad Fearson, you knew him from high school.
He had been your designated tormentor back in the day, always going out of his way to try and humiliate you in front of the other students but acting buddy-buddy in front of the teachers.
You had an almost permanent bruise inbetween your shoulderblades from where he would always greet you with a 'friendly' back slap.
It had only lessened in the last year before graduation, where he was too busy being a full time jock and you were studying.
When you had found out that this was his house you had nearly turned the job down, but you needed the money and couldn't afford to be picky.
"Oh?" You ask.
"Chad's not around?"
She sighed, and even her summer hat seemed to droop as she answered.
"He was supposed to be helping with these chores but he's been spending most of his time out with his friends, so I don't really see all that much of him these days..."
Yup, sounds like Chad.
"What about Mr Fearson?" You ask, noting the golden band around her furry finger.
"There isn't one unfortunately, he passed back when Chad was little."
Crap, way to put your foot in it genius.
"Oh I'm sorry Jill, I didn't meant to-"
She stopped you with another wave of her hand.
"Don't you worry about that Anon, it's old news."
Noting you had finished your drink she took the empty glass and returned it to the tray.
"Okay I better let you get back to work then, if you want another drink then just come find me in the kitchen alright?"
With that she was gone, her tail swishing behind as she made her way back towards the house.
Oh well, back to work.
------------------------------------------------------------------

The lawn was slower going than you had hoped, which ate into your mental timetable.
On top of the poor capacity of the mower, you kept finding things hidden in the grass that threatened to jam it.
Mostly, these small obstructions came in the form of old beer cans and bottles.
Somehow you didn't figure Jill for the beer can tossing type so you surmised they were probably the remains from one of Chad's many pool bashes he threw his friends, one that he had not cleaned up after.
Oh well, just another chore you were getting paid to do you guess.
You should still be able to finish the lawn by today if you keep at it, but in the ever present glare of the sun it would be hard going so you decide to take your employer up on her offer of another cold drink.
Soon you make your way over to the big colonial style old house and find the glass patio doors leading to the kitchen.
The sliding door is already open but there is no sign of Jill.
You knock but don't get a response, so instead take a step inside and call out.
"Mrs Fea- I mean Jill?  It's Anon, are you here?"
After a moment you hear her voice trill down from what must be upstairs.
"Hi Anon!  Are you ready for that drink?  Come on in and help yourself, it's in the fridge!"
Gratefully, you step inside out of the heat and head for the large fridge.
Inside you find the pitcher of icy lemonade (and a considerable number of chilling wine bottles).
As you go looking for a glass you see Jill's hat on the counter, next go her sunglasses and a little magazine that talked about singles trips and travelling.
As you pour yourself a glass of iced relief, Jill walked in through the doorway.
If you hadn't been looking she would easily have surprised you, her padded feet made no sound as she almost glided across the wooden floor.
"Oh good you found it, help yourself there's plenty there."
Without her hat and shades you were afforded a proper look at her face.
Most of the anthro lion types you had met before had sleek fur across their face, some more pronounced fur around their mouths and then it would vary in colouring depending on age and race.
Jill however had an almost fuzzy looking complexion, with her fur being slightly longer around her cheeks and the colouring being far lighter than expected.
Her black lips framed her set of intimidating fangs, which drew the eye despite the friendly smile.
Her pink T shaped nose wrinkled slightly as she smiled, while the wide and flat bridge above led up to her set of almost sparkling green eyes.
The colour was unusual, with her son Chad and others you had met before mostly having either pale powder blue or light grey as standard.
Two round ears poked out at the top of her head slightly to each side,  each with a tufting of almost white fur around them.
Wanting to avoid more awkward silences you try and keep talking.
"So, are you planning a trip then?  To get out of this heat maybe?"
Her features creased slightly as she gave you a confused look in response.
"A trip?  Why do you ask?"
You gesture towards the open magazine with your glass.
"Just saw that on my way in and thought you might have been looking, that's all."
She glanced at the open pages and chuckled.
"Oh that!  Just a bit of wishful thinking is all, there's not all that much point travelling about by myself at my age anyway so..."
As she trailed off you had to wonder about her words, she was talking kind of like an old aged pensioner...
"Really?  My parents have just taken off on a round tour of the States in a glorified camper van for their retirement and, if you'll forgive me for saying, you look a lot younger than they do so I'm sure you could go travelling too if you wanted."
She looked at you for a second, a little taken aback by your openness and with her hand pressed to her mouth.
Crap.
You and your big mouth...
Then, she laughed, or giggled if you were to be more precise.
"Oh that's very sweet of you to say young man, but do you know how old I actually am?"
Pausing to way up your options, the possibility of a face full of lemonade and a sudden incurable bout of unemployment tell you to be honest... and then take a couple of years off to be safe.
"I never like to guess a lady's age but since you're asking..."
You make a show of tapping your chin and counting your fingers before answering.
"I'd say you can't be more than... early forties?  Forty three?"
She giggled again, much more girlishly this time.
"Oh you...  Thank you for the compliment but I actually had my fiftieth birthday last week, so I'm 'half way to a hundred' now, as my dear son Chad keeps telling me..."
You blink in actual surprise.
"Really?  Well wow... whatever you're doing, keep on doing it because you really don't look it."
She smiled a little wider but her eyes still said they didn't believe you, at least not entirely.
"You said your parents have gone traveling?" She asked.
"If I'm not being too nosey could I ask how old they are?"
It was your turn to chuckle.
"Mom is sixty nine and Dad is seventy five."
She nodded thoughtfully.
"I think you finished school the same year as my Chad, which makes you around nineteen right?"
You nod.
"Then they had you pretty late...  Do you have any siblings?"
"Quite a few actually, but I'm the youngest." you answer.
She looked poised to press you further, but family was a touchy subject right now so you decide to cut it short.
"Well, break time is about over so I better get back to it."
She smiled and took your glass, perhaps sensing she was encroaching and shouldn't push any further.
"Thanks for the drink."
With that you head back out into the afternoon heat.
-------------------------------------------------------------

It was a good few hours later when finally you finished, when the mower finally fell silent.
It had been a hard day's work and the extra clean up had set you back, but the first part was over.
Once you had packed the equipment back into the little toolshed it was time to go get your pay, you had arranged to get paid daily after the last job that had run more than a single day had stiffed you by the homeowner croaking during the night.
It was rather difficult to collect from someone when they're in the morgue...
When you reach the kitchen you find Jill there waiting, flipping through the magazine andwith more interest apparently after your chat earlier.
She looked up and greeted you with another of her smiles, her whiskers bristling slightly as her lips rose.
"Ah Anon, have you finished already?"
You nod.
"Well the grass anyway, still got all the other jobs to get started on tomorrow."
She stood and reached for her purse, a bulky brown number over on the counter, while still looking towards you.
"So what have you got planned for tomorrow?  Are you going to work on cleaning up the pool?"
You had set on dealing with the murky hole in the ground on day three, but...
"Well, I was going to get cleaning after the hedges and that overgrown tree get a trim but if you want I can get to work on it tomorrow?"
She stopped rummaging through her purse for a second and gave you a nervous look.
"Really?  Oh don't change your schedule on my account Anon, I was just curious is all..."
It was here at this point that you first started down what you would one day call 'the golden path', when in response to a perfectly innocent exchange, you had a sudden mental image of the cheerful Mrs Fearson dipping into the pool in nothing but a skimpy swim suit...
Perhaps if you were a better man, you would have shaken the image from your mind and put it down to a touch of heatstroke.
But the man that you were looked at that image, and liked what he saw...
"Its no problem at all Jill!" you say with a grin.
"Its hotter than hell outside and I bet you can't wait to take a dip to cool off."
She had found your pay from the depths of her bag but she stopped short of handing it to you, mulling over your words instead.
"Oh no dear that pool isn't for me, Chad used to use it for some of his... get togethers with his friends."
You frown.
"So there's a nice great big pool in your nice private garden but you never use it for yourself?"
She sighed.
"No, I used to enjoy going for a swim back in my younger days but it's not like I can pull off wearing a bikini these days..."
Time to push your luck here a little...
"What?  Nonsense!" you smirk, leading her eyes to flash towards you defensively.
"You could totally still rock a bikini, you certainly have the figure for it if you don't mind me saying?"
You actually held your breath as you waited for her to respond.
Either your compliment would have it's desired effect or she would be giving you your marching orders in the next few seconds.
She stood quietly searching your face with her eyes for a second, those sparkling green slitted peepers scanning for any sign of mockery or mirth.
When she found none however, a slight blush could be seen glowing on her skin where the fur was at its thinnest, at the corners of her mouth and by her ears.
"Th-thats very kind of you to say Anon but-"
You smiled a little wider.
"I'm just saying as I see."
When the smile began to return to her dark lips you go for the bonus round.
"Tell you what, if you promise to be the first one to take a dip in it (fuck Chad), then I'll move my schedule around and get to work on the pool tomorrow."
She looked slightly panicked again and tried to speak, but you cut her off.
"If I start tomorrow morning, it should be ready by the day after."
She once more opened her mouth to protest but you once more got in first.
"The forecast says that that day is going to be the hottest of the year so you'll be glad to have it ready, so what do you say?"
She still looked unsure, but the dye was cast now so no going back.
"Okay great!  I'll bring my pool gear tomorrow and I already know you still have some chlorine in the shed so we are good to go!"
As she stood and blinked, you reached over and plucked your pay from her hand.
As you turned to leave, you paused just long enough to throw one last comment over your shoulder.
"Better dig out that bikini of yours Jill, it's really going to be a scorcher and I bet you'll still look a knockout in it!"
With an overly jovial "Buh-bye!", you took your leave, stopping only long enough to retrieve your shirt before heading home.
There was no need to count the money she'd paid you for today as it all of a sudden seemed less important.
You had a little something else in mind from Mrs Fearson, something that should be a whole lot more... hands on, than your agreed fee.
For the first time since you started this whole gardening/handyman gig, you walked home with a spring in your step, a whistled tune on your lips, and the mental image of a fine cougar in a bikini very much in your thoughts...
-------------------------------------------

Chapter 2 - Poolboy Blue-balls

It was still quite early when you arrived at the Fearson residence the following morning.
The sun was still hanging low in the sky and there was a slight mist clinging to ground where the steadily rising heat forced the morning dew to flee into the air.
You had brought with you some of the things you would need for today, such as your pool net, cleaning equipment and a couple of items you knew weren't in the toolshed.
If the pool had been left neglected the same way as the rest of the garden had, then you knew it would take more than plucking a few stray leaves from the surface to get it back up to scratch.
In truth, you could have arrived a bit later in the day and probably got away with a general spruce up and dumped a load of chlorine into it, but after your little chat with Jill yesterday it felt important to you to go all out and do things properly.

The large garden was empty, save for a few birds pecking at your still freshly cut lawn for their breakfast.
Jill wasn't expecting you for another couple of hours, but you were eager to begin.
The pool was over on the far side of the garden, behind the house proper and blocked from view to any would-be gawkers by the boundary hedgerows, which even after whenever you finally got around to trimming them down would ensure privacy to any swimmers.
It had been loosely covered up by the plastic sheeting provided but not properly secured, which along with the layer of dead leaves on top, didn't bode well for any hope of a simple task...
Dropping your stuff, you set about pulling back the sheeting to get a better look.
It was... better than you had feared, but worse than you'd hoped...
The pool still had a full compliment of water somehow which saved you having to worry about completely refilling it, but it looked more like the contents of a stew pot than the sparkling blue of a healthy swimmers oasis.
The water was full of all sorts of floating debris, from the expected dead foliage, to floating beer bottles, to what may or may not have been a newspaper in a past life.
It was a poor shade of green with visible sediment at the bottom, not the worst state you had found a pool in after some neglect but enough for a full day's work ahead of you to fix and most likely a night of leaving it to stew in a whole lot of cleaning and antifungal chemicals before it could be used.
No seeing Jill in her swimwear today then...

It didn't take you long to shake the disappointment and work out a plan.
First it would be a matter of checking the pump and filters to make sure they were working, followed by a cleaning of said filter, removing the crap floating in the pool itself, cleaning the interior and surrounding decking, vacuuming, possibly cleaning the filter again and the testing the water Ph levels.
Once all that was done, you could add the antifungals and chlorine and leave it to do its thing until morning.
If all went well then hopefully by this time tomorrow you would have a clean and usable pool, along with a scantily clad and grateful cougar if you were lucky...
---------------------------------------------------

The first part of your plan sadly took longer than anticipated.
The pump and connections were in good shape, but what you hadn't expected was the condition of the removable filter.
It looked like it had never been cleaned, at all.
Also, it wasn't just caked with general dirt and pool gunk, but by something you in hindsight should have anticipated considering who lived here.
Clumps of sandy coloured fur and hair, from Chad and his friends no doubt...
It took a hose, some thick gloves and most of your repertoire of swear and cursewords to get the thing clean again, but it was a step in the right direction at least.
As an unintended consequence however, you inadvertently summoned the lady of the house.
Through the glass patio doors came Jill, tentatively stepping out onto the grass in a figure hugging bath robe and clutching a steaming cup of coffee like her life depended on it.
"Anon?  Is that you?"
You stopped your cursing and cleaning, and instead turned to face her.
"Morning Jill!  Please tell me I didn't wake you?"
Her confused frown flipped to a signature warm smile.
"What?  No of course not, I just wasn't expecting you this early..."
Whereas the puffy top she wore yesterday hid her figure from prying eyes, the green silken robe hugged her form tightly and gave a much clearer inclination as to what lay within...
She was by no stretch of the imagination a size zero but she had a surprisingly more pleasing shape than some of the girls your own age, who hung around at the mall with all but their tits out expecting universal praise.
"Well I just thought it would be better to get an early start on things, that's all."
As you turned to continue your work on the filter, you expected the still sleepy lioness to return to the house.
She didn't however...
"Mind... I appreciate what you said yesterday but you don't have to go cleaning up the pool on my account." she began.
"It looks like it's going to take quite some doing to fix up and I'm not trying to make work for you..."
So she had been thinking of your comments yesterday had she?
"Its no problem Jill, I'm here to do this stuff anyway." you respond.
When she didn't answer, you decided to push the subject.
"You said yesterday that you used to enjoy swimming, was it a hobby or...?"
She blushed again slightly before answering.
"Well I used to swim competitively back in my younger days, even have a couple of awards stashed in the attic somewhere, but after I started expecting Chad I gave it all up."
So under that mom bod was an athlete huh?
You smile, flashing both your teeth and your eyes.
"Well then, all the more reason to get moving then."
In response to her questioning look, you continue.
"Since Chad is a big boy now then there's no reason for you to not pick it all back up again if you enjoyed it?"
She opened her mouth, with what looked like a dozen rebuttals ready to respond.
Yet no words followed, other than...
"Well thank you Anon... we will see what happens then..."
As she turned and strolled back inside, you smiled and returned to work with earnest.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------

As the day wore on you started to make some progress.
With the filter running properly and all the preparations you had made, it would only be a matter of time before the water cleared and it started to look like more than a glorified pond.
There was one considerable issue however that you had not factored into your plans...
About an hour after she had left you to your work, Jill returned.
She had pulled out a folding sun lounger from somewhere and set it up on the grass, not all that far away from where you were working.
She was once more wearing her big sun hat and sunglasses, but instead of her restrictive number from yesterday she had changed into something much less conservative.
Her puffy top had been replaced with a tight fitting sleevelees one, with a eye-drawingly low neck line and that accentuated her large bust very nicely.
Where yesterday her legs had been hidden away under a pair of pants they now stood freely in the sunshine, a pair of shorts cutting off part way up her thighs and a bright flowery sarong wrapped around her waist.
You couldn't help but stare when she walked out, and then as she bent over slightly to place and adjust a little table next the the lounger, her tail swishing and lifting the sarong slightly to give you a tantalizing peek at her shapely rump beneath...
She had turned then to see you watching, only to stand up straight again and give you a tentative little wave.
"Oh don't mind me Anon, I just thought I'd come out and take advantage of my recently reclaimed lawn and enjoy some sunshine."
You smile and wave back, noticing her tense up ever so slightly as you do.
"Okay, you enjoy yourself now."

With that you get back to it, leaving her to set up on her lounger with a book and a drink.
It was hard going though, not only because of the layer of grime stuck fast to tiles within the pool itself, but because you found yourself glancing over at the reclining cougar from time to time and becoming distracted.
She sat with her legs stretched out in front of her, one bent at the knee and the other out straight.
Her sandy fur seemed to glisten slightly in the sunlight, suggesting she'd rubbed some oil or other product in before coming out.
She sat with a book held in her lap by one hand, while her other arm served as a rest against the lounger behind her head.
The result was that her raised arm pulled at her top on the side facing you, which revealed she wasn't wearing a bra underneath, and a substantial show of furry side-boob...
You did your best to focus, shaking your head from time to time or scrubbing at a part of the pool's surrounding decking extra hard, but it was no good.
It seemed impossible to pull your eyes away from her relaxed figure, or the pleasing shape of her curves.
It finally came to a head when she put the book down and had a stretch, extending her legs out and her arms upwards, arching her back and obviously enjoying the feel of the sun... and caught you watching with a sideways glance from behind her sunglasses.
You held her gaze for a second, before each of you looked away.
As you busied yourself with your work, you mulled over what you had seen.
She had seen you looking, seen how you were watching her, and she had returned it unflinchingly.
It was at this point you decided to cool things down.
You had to play this carefully after all...
Of course this didn't mean putting more clothes on or calling it an early day and leaving, oh no.
Instead you decided it was time to give the interior of the pool a proper scrubbing, which meant getting wet.
While continuing to avert your eyes from Jill, you set about stripping down to the swim shorts you wore beneath your pants, taking your time to remove each piece of clothing and giving any secretly watching cougars a bit of a show.
When you were done and wore nothing but the shorts, you slipped into the cool pool water and got to work.
It wasn't pleasant, despite the temporary escape from the sun's harsh rays, as the water was still not properly clean, but you could endure it for the time being.
The water only came up to your waist at its deepest, so as you stood and reached for your scrubber you took a quick peek over at Jill from the corner of your eye to see what she was up to.
To your dismay however, she had left her lounger and made her way hastily to the kitchen again...
Damn, had you overdone it?
She soon returned however, once again baring a tray of drinks.
"I though you might be thirsty by now and brought you a drink..."
Before you could answer from your position in the pool or try to pull yourself out, she leant down and held a glass out for you, giving you a clear flash of her creamy cleavage in the process...
Gratefully you accept the cold drink, but stop short of a single sip as you taste it.
You could taste the unmistakable twang of gin, and not just the hint of a shot added in, but more like she was having a dash of lemonade with a glass of the stuff...
As you look questioningly up at the still waiting cougar, you see her eyes go wide when she sips from the other glass.
"Oops!  Looks like I got them mixed up there a little!  Here, let me put this right."
Once more she bent down, flashed you her cleavage and swapped over your two glasses.
With some small disappointment, you realise your new glass was 100% non alcoholic.
With only a small chuckle, she retreated back to her lounger, leaving you to wonder why she was drinking spirits so early in the day...
Was this a normal thing for her?
Or perhaps....  
Was she trying to work up some Dutch courage for something?
Placing your quickly drained glass on the decking, you go back to work, your mind racing and a small grin firmly set upon your lips...
--------------------------------------------------------------------------

It wasn't until several hours later that you finally broke the back of your task, having cleared away the worst of the muck, rubbish and sediment plaguing the pool and getting it in a position where it might just be usable again.
All that was left was to add the chlorine granules and then leave the filter running over night to make sure.
Then by tomorrow morning, after a final Ph test, it should be ready for use.
Jill for her part had spent the afternoon on her lounger, getting increasingly sozzled and pretending to read.
You knew she was pretending as she had apparently been studying the same page for over an hour, and the flash of green from behind those big sunglasses every time you stole a look told you she was more interested in secretly watching you work.
As you packed away the equipment you had borrowed from the shed, she rose from her lounger and walked over to meet you, albeit somewhat unsteadily.
"Are you all finished for today then?" she asked, slurring her words slightly.
"Yup, I've done all I can do for today with it so we just need to leave it overnight and it should be all good to go."
She gave you an appraising up and down look over the top of her glasses before asking her next question.
"So what are you going to do now?  Are you going home for the day?"
You nod, but she cut you off before you could respond properly.
"Oh dear, look at the state of you!  I can't just let you walk home like that..."
You were still in your swim shorts and covered in a fine layer of dirt from the pool water, a quick wash under the garden hose would be enough to let you get dressed again but you were curious as to where she was going with this.
"Why don't you come inside and use the shower?  There's plenty of hot water and I don't mind loaning you a towel."
As she said this, she slowly ran a padded finger along your arm, withdrawing it as she reached the elbow and then rubbing it against her thumb to dislodge the dirt gathered there.
You had always associated mountain lion fur and pads with discomfort thanks to Chad, but the softness of her touch caused a little trail of goosebumps to form along your skin and you had to suppress a shiver.
"That's... really very kind Jill." you respond carefully.
"A hot shower sounds perfect."
With that she hooked her arm around yours and led you into the house.

She continued to talk nervously about everything and nothing as she led you through her home, commenting on the weather or how long she had owned a particular rug, until finally reaching the bathroom on the first floor.
"Here we are, it's just through there!" she chirped, struggling somewhat to keep her voice level and avoiding eye contact with you.
"There's a towel on the hook already but I don't have any human shampoos I'm afraid, but there is a bar of soap if that helps?"
Truth be told, you had been washing in a communal shower at the local community pool since living by yourself, so the privacy of an actual bathroom and a bar of soap was more than okay.
"This is great Jill, I mean it thank you."
She lingered there for a second or so, as if she had something else to say or was trying to build up to something.
In the end though she smiled and quickly made her way back down the stairs, possibly for more gin...
If you were reading the signals right, she knew you had been eyeing her all day, she was tempted to say or do something about it too, but something was holding her back.
You knew better than to try push your luck with a semi-inebriated cougar alone in her home.
It was far better to let her come to you...
Stripping off your shorts, you switch on the shower and head on in to the spacious glass cubicle.
Regardless of what may or may not be going on within Jill's head you couldn't pass up a hot shower after wading around in dirty pool water for the last few hours.
You had made the conscious decision however to not lock the bathroom door, and to actually leave it ajar...
It only took a pleasant few minutes of soapy scrubbing before you heared the sound of someone making their way back up the wooden staircase outside the door, it would seem several glasses of gin hadn't done much for the cougar's natural stealthiness.
For a few minutes nothing happened, so you continued showering and humming a random tune as you listened for movement.
Either she had simply passed by and your imagination was simply running away with you, or she was silently stood just outside, listening to you wash.
You had your answer before too long.
Your humming fell silent as you heard a tentative knocking at the door.
"Anon?  It's me, Jill..."
You wait.
"I was just checking that everything was okay for you in there?"
You leave it a few seconds before responding, keeping your voice even and calm.
"I'm fine thanks, the water's lovely."
"O-oh good..."
It was time.
"Is there something you need Jill?"
Silence.
You had the mental image of her standing just outside, biting her lip and tipsy mind racing.
You poke your head out of the cubicle so that you didn't have to compete with the noise of the water, swirling steam obscuring much of the room apart from the doorway.
"Is there something you need Jill, from me?"
Moments pass silently as you wait for a response, until finally she spoke.
"N-need... from y-you, Anon?"
Her voice was barely a whisper, but she must have been pressed right up outside the slightly open door as you had no problem hearing her.
You held your breath as she eventually drew up the courage to take the next step...
"Can I c-come in?"
You smile, just one final push...
"Of course, the door is open."
Slowly, the door creaked open as she pushed against it, until nothing stood between you except the still swirling steam and humid air.
You had already stepped out of the shower and wrapped the towel around your waist, and now stood waiting for her.
She stepped in slowly, green eyes wide and fixed on your still dripping wet body.
Her hands danced as she wrung them nervously.
You cocked your head slightly and asked one more time.
"Do you want something from me... Jill?"
She crept closer, her eyes now locked with yours.
Her hand reached out slowly towards you, stopped, and then moved in the direction of your towel.
You were already at about half mast by this point, a non too shabby bulge pressing against the soft fabric, a present waiting just for her to unwrap.
"I-I... want...-"
She was almost there, when the moment suddenly shattered into a thousand dancing pieces.
"Mom I'm home!  Where you at?"
It was fucking Chad.
Her reaction was instantaneous, snatching her hand back away from her prize and stepping out through the door.
"I'm just upstairs dear... b-be down in a minute!"
She looked back to you, a mix of regret and frustration in her eyes, before she slipped away towards the stairs.
"I'll be back with your clothes in a second and your pay."
Her voice trailed out from behind her as she went, leaving both you and a particular part of your anatomy thouroghly deflated.
God damn Chad...
-----------------------------------------------------------------------

By the time you had dried yourself off with the towel, Jill had been and gone, leaving your clothes outside the door with your pay in an envelope on top.
She had retreated downstairs, most likely to see to her beloved son and his shouts of-
"Mom I'm hungry!  Go make me a sandwich or something!"
You wrung out the shorts but didn't put them back on, deciding it was best to go commando under your pants than not, and headed downstairs.
It was a reasonably big house so you stuck to the route Jill had brought you in through and returned to the kitchen.
Within you found Jill and Chad, the former buttering up some bread with a blank expression while the latter leaned against the worktop swigging on an energy drink.
He had changed since you last saw him, but not exactly for the better...
It looked like he had continued to grow after leaving high school but not upwards, he had grown outwards, specifically around the gut area.
No longer was he the intimidating wall of muscle jock that you remembered, but was now a chubby looking waster living off his mom like a tumour.
He had the same sandy coloured fur as his mother and stood around your height, he still wore a football jersey similar to the one he had in school but was more of a tight fit these days, along with some ragged jeans.
It took him a minute, but eventually he recognised you too.
"Is that... Anon!?!" he sputtered, sending a sprinkling of his drink across the room.
"Yes, he's the one I told you was coming to help with the chores that you were supposed to be doing."
Jill's eyes darted between you both nervously as she spoke, either still worried about what had nearly happened upstairs or perhaps sensing the atmosphere between you and Chad.
You put on a friendly smile, determined to not let the bastard intimidate you like he used to.
"Long time no see Chad, how ya been?"
He simply snorted out more energy drink and collapsed laughing.
"O-oh this is p-priceless!" he sniggerd.
"After all that time in school the best you could do is go be my poolboy..."
A fresh fit of laughter thankfully robbed him of any further words so you took your opportunity to leave.
"Alright I'm off then, thanks for the pay Jill and I'll see you tomorrow."
Her face had fallen into a scowl as she watched her son roll around the floor, but brightened up slightly as you spoke.
"Okay Anon, thank you!"
As you left she called out again.
"I found my swim suit so I'm looking forward to trying it on again in the pool!"
You chuckled and flashed her a smile, noticing that Chad had stopped laughing.
"Wait, what?"
You were already out the door though and heading down the garden.

You had only made it about half way to the gate when you heard the tell tale puffing noise of someone that is very much out of shape attempting to run behind you, followed by a wheezing voice that could only belong to Chad.
"Hey... Anon... wait a... minute..." he wheezed.
You turned and waited, curious as to what he would do.
He finally caught up and tried to glare at you, a far less intimidating display without his old cronies from back in the day.
"Why's my Mom talking to you about a swim suit?" he demanded.
You shrugged.
"I just spent the day cleaning out the pool, she said she wants to go swimming in it tomorrow, that's all."
You could see the cogs grinding away in that little head of his, but no sign of any light bulbs lighting up.
He never was the sharpest knife in the drawer...
After a moment, he flashed a smile of his own, one you recognised from the old days.
You stiffened in preparation as he spoke.
"I don't think I like you skulking about my house like this Anon, so how about you just give me back that money my Mom gave you like a good little humie and don't bother coming back hmm?"
He finished his little speech with one of his signature 'friendly' back slaps, just like he used to do.
This time however, things were different.
His padded hand was no longer driven by the throwing arm of a football player, but by a cheeto eating waster, and his target was not the smaller boy flinching away, but a tall, far more toned man.
His hand connected with a sharp slap, causing you a slight jolt but causing him go pull it away hissing.
"Crap!" he whined.
"What-"
The tables had turned.
Just in case Jill was watching from somewhere, you grab his stinging hand in your own, like you intended to shake it for old times sake.
It truth however, you held it in a crushing deathgrip.
His soft furry appendage creaked under the strain from your labour hardened mitt.
"Let me be clear Chad..." you begin through gritted teeth.
"High school was a long time ago, we are both obviously very different people now."
He pulled helplessly to free his hand but he wasn't going anywhere until you said so.
"Now, tomorrow I'm coming back to do the work you are to lazy to do, and your mom is going to pay me for it, because that's how having a job works."
You pull him in closer.
"You on the other hand, are going to make yourself scarce, because if I have to look at your mug while I'm working, I might just forget myself and start telling Jill all about what you used to get up to back then, and all the things you used to brag about getting away with behind her back..."
He froze, his eyes widening in horror.
"You wouldn't..."
You smile, in a far less friendly way now too.
"I will, and then since you seem to have let yourself go and are nothing more than a tub of lard these days, I might just beat the crap out of you too, you know, for old time's sake..."
Another squeeze of his hand had him dropping to his knees, which is when you let him go.
As you turned to leave, you look over your shoulder.
"You piss off for the day, then we probably never have to see each other again, okay?"
You didn't wait for an answer and left.

As you walked home, whistling a merry tune, you pondered just how things had changed since back then.
True, you were working yourself silly and living in a trailer right now instead of heading out to college like your friends, but you just got one over on your old tormentor, which was something.
Plus there was the prospect of tomorrow...
If Chad made himself scarce like you told him, then you would have peace and quiet tomorrow to work.
Plus there was Jill's parting remark about her swim suit...
You damn near started to skip as you walked, imagining all the ways you could be pissing Chad off tomorrow.
Dropping hints to Jill about some of the crap he used to boast about, swiping some of his drinks from the fridge just to let him know you had been there.
The prospect of fucking his mom sideways on his bed...
Fuck skipping, it was time to sing and dance your way home today...
--------------------------------------

Chapter 3 - Mrs Fearson's Bush

It was supposed to have been the build up to something special.
The odd looks on your way home from those who passed you had meant nothing as you had strutted back home, your mind swinging from the memories from earlier today to the tantalizing possibilities of tomorrow.
The good mood didn't last however.
It never did these days.
Your smile faded away as you turned the last corner and reached your destination; your humble trailer home.
It was a simple metal box, built barely large enough to squeeze in a single occupant, rusting around the edges and stood on cheap concrete blocks.
It has once had wheels, or so you had been told, but they had long since rusted and decayed into nothing.
It sat on the edge of a small trailer park that had been built as a place for holiday makers and tourists to come and park up for a night or more, but with barely anything in or around this nowhere little town to attract them to stay it had shut down and gone to crap.
It was the cheapest place available for a single guy to rent and at least put a roof over your head at night, even if it did leak in the rain...
The surrounding plot was covered with a thin carpet of brown, and quite dead grass, an odd thing to have you might think for someone who spent so much of his time tending other people's gardens.
Yet despite your initial best efforts it had failed to do anything but get somehow deader, giving you the thought that something toxic might have been added to the soil at some point previously, so you gave up.
It didn't really boost the spirits to come home to every day.
So with a sigh, you trudge over the crunching dead grass and enter your trailer through the squealing metal door, your mood now much reduced.

Your living space consisted of a tiny kitchen area (more of half a counter and a kettle), an overhead compartment for your few clothes, and a small sleeping bag that served as your full time bed.
You also had a camping hotplate for cooking stashed somewhere.
It was always like this, at least since you had moved in here.
No matter how positively you thought, coming back here always brought you right back down again.
You didn't have much of a choice though,as every penny you earned that wasn't taken up with rent or basic necessities went into your savings account.
After all that crap went down with your family, you had been left here alone, making your own way and saving up to finally get yourself away from this place and into your future.
A dark, joyless chuckle slipped from your mouth as you thought those words.
'Your future'.
The truth was that you had been living like this for a while now, but had saved really very little, certainly nowhere near enough to reach your goal.
At this rate you would be here another year at least scrounging and saving before you could even consider attempting the move to the place with your chosen college in it.
As you mulled over your plans and perpetually out of reach target, you thought again of Jill.
There had been something there today, in the bathroom she had responded to your none too subtle advances.
If Chad hadn't of come back when he did then it looked likely that things would have escalated really quite quickly...
It was at this point you lost your nerve, that the old and well worn doubts crept back inside your head and got to work.
What were you doing?  Why were you messing with this woman?  Was it just to stick one to Chad?
Do you really think she would have gone through with it?  With someone like you?  She's just lonely and you were taking advantage!
As your thoughts darkened you reached into one of the few secure cubbyholes the trailer had and pulled out a bottle of whiskey.
It had been a gift from one of your previous employers, an elderly mole-man who had been grateful for the work you had done for him and wanted to reward you.
It had been kept safe, hoarded, not to be opened until you reached your target and celebrated your last night in this nowhere town.
Yet as you poured a generous shot into a cheap plastic cup, you had decided to use it instead to block out the darkening thoughts within.
As the night wore on, your last cohesive thought was of Jill, and how tomorrow you were just going to do the job you were paid for and leave.
It wasn't fair to try use her like you had been planning, and it's not like she would even have gone through with it anyway, not with someone like you.
With barely half the bottle drained, you fell into an uncomfortable but dreamless sleep, succeeding in escaping your dark thoughts for now at least.
-----------------------------------------------------

The next morning you arrived at the Fearson house bright and early, despite sporting a modest hangover and a few of your self doubts that you had failed to drown,
Like yesterday there was no sign of anyone awake or about.
Good, you thought, and got to work.

Today you were going to work on the bushes, tree, and general shrubbery both within and surrounding the garden.  
Some of the offending greenery had overgrown and just needed a trimming, while others had grown into an unruly mess and would need the attentions of a powertool.
You decided to first give the pool it's last once over to make sure it was ready and safe for use, an easy task but essential if you didn't want someone jumping in later and getting blinded by too much chlorine or something.
There was a portable PH tester in the shed, and after a quick few button taps you got the result.
It was within the ideal range, so the pool was good to go.
After skimming the surface with the net to remove the leaves that had gathered overnight, you declared the pool now open, albeit to an empty garden, but it still felt good either way after all the work it took to clean it.
You turned your attention to the bushes and spent some time with a large set of clippers snipping away at the outstretching branches, it didn't take long though before the previous day repeated itself and Jill came out the patio door, clutching another cup of morning coffee and wearing that figure hugging robe.
"Morning Anon!" she chirped happily.
"Back at it early again I see, I certainly appreciate your enthusiasm."
As she approached you dropped the clippers, the doubts from last night still with you and robbing you of the confidence from before.
"Morning Jill, yeah there's lots to still do so I thought it best to just get to it."
When she stood next to you, your eyes found their gaze pulled south.
Her robe wasn't pulled as tightly as it had been yesterday, which left a sizeable opening at the front and giving you a clear view of her ample cleavage.
Either she was wearing some really very low cut nightclothes under there or...
With some effort you pull your eyes back upwards and shake your head a little, as if trying to shake the thoughts from your mind before they had a chance to form.
You tried to say something, anything, just to avoid a silence when she beat you to it.
"Oh by the way, Chad said he's going out today again with his friends.  I'd hoped he might stay to help you with the bushes maybe but he wasn't having any of it..."
She turned and raised a shout back towards the house.
"Chad!  I was right!  Anon's already here at work!  Come say hi before you go!"
From the still open doorway emerged Chad, or at least his head.
He didn't say anything but the dark look he gave you said all he wanted.
You gave him a deliberately cheery wave, before he once more disappeared from sight with a scowl.
Jill sighed and shook her head.
"Such a grump in the mornings, I don't know..."
She stood there with you, talking about nothing in particular until you heared a bang coming from the front of the house.
It was the sound of the front door slamming shut as Chad made his exit.
You had been thinking up scenarios yesterday about just this situation, of how after Chad leaving you would make another move on Jill, and of all the lewd things you might do to her in the time following.
Yet now you were here, the self doubt was firmly back in control, and a very different set of words began to tumble from your mouth.
"Jill?  I want to apologise, for yesterday."
She stopped her chattering and looked up at you, confused.
"Apologise?  Whatever for?" she asked, but the look in her eye said she knew what you were talking about.
"Well, the last couple of days I've been acting... inappropriately, towards you and it's not been very professional of me.  I just wanted to say sorry if I've made you feel uncomfortable and that I'll keep myself in check from now on.  I didn't mean the things I said"
She stood there for a second, staring at you as if she was waiting for something more, but when you remained silent she seemed to deflate slightly and pulled her robe tighter with her free hand.
"Oh, I see." she responded quietly.
She stared searchingly into your eyes with an intensity that surprised you.
After a second you found yourself looking away, unable to match her gaze, perhaps due to the mistruthes you had just told her.
Without another word, she broke her stare, turned, and made her way back inside.
You were left alone with the bushes, your traitorous doubts, and the knowledge that once again you had pussied out of something that you might never have another chance at again.
------------------------------------------------

Over the next hour or so you made your way around the perimeter of the garden, snipping and cutting at the greenery and otherwise focusing on the task at hand.
Jill hadn't come back out since you had spoken, so you had been able to work without the distraction of her lounging in the sun peacefully and alluringly.
It was a bittersweet sort of feeling.
Every now and again though you looked up at the house, the inexplicable feeling of being watched tingling across the back of your neck.
You never saw anyone, but you could swear that you saw the curtain in one of the upstairs windows twitch once or twice...
It wasn't fair what you had done, messing with the emotions of a lonely widow and then backing off so suddenly, but you were an asshole either way so it was best to just stop it before it got any further.
Or at least that what the self doubting part of your mind kept telling you anyway.
It was with some surprise however that you heard the patio door slide open again, and much more surprise still when you saw Jill emerge.
She was still in her robe it seemed, but she was now barefoot and carrying a towel.
Without looking at you, she walked over towards the pool and dropped the towel on the decking at its edge.
For the next minute or so she just stood there, unmoving and a far away look in her eyes.
You meanwhile were just getting started on the bushes immediately surrounding the pool, the ones that granted any swimmers their privacy.
She finally turned go face you and spoke, her words strangely distant.
"Anon?  Did you check the water yet?  Is it ready?"
You stop and turn to her, giving a nod as your answer.
Before you could turn back away however, she tugged sharply on the cord around her waist and sent the robe fluttering down to the ground.
Your jaw dropped, almost far enough to meet it there.
Before you stood a very different Jill Fearson to the one you knew.
She was wearing nothing but a black, tight-fitting string bikini.
Her breasts, just barely restrained by the thin black fabric of her top, were roughly about the size of a pair of melons.
Her waistline was no longer that of the swimmer she had been in her youth, a bit of a pot poking forwards as evidence of her more relaxed lifestyle, but she still cut an impressive figure, one that a woman half her age would be jealous of.
The bikini bottoms were secured at her sides with tied string, leaving her ample hips on full display and little to the imagination.
Her sandy fur had been smoothed down, likely with more of what she had been using yesterday, giving her a sleek look to complete the picture of a woman out for the long haul in the sunshine.
She saw the look on your face, read the thoughts through your eyes, and smiled.
"Why the strange look Anon?" she asked innocently.
"I told you I had found my old swimsuit.  It's s bit tighter than I remember though..."
You could just about close your still gaping jaw before blinking and trying to pull your eyes from her figure.
"Uh... sorry about that, I just... uh..."
Nope, she'd blindsided you good and proper, and it was going to take a minute to restore normal brain functions it seemed.
You could but watch as she turned away and started to slip into the pool.
As her tail flicked, you saw that the bikini bottoms had more in common with a thong, as the back slipped down between her glorious ass cheeks.
It was all you could bare to watch, as a sudden stirring in your pants signaled it was time to turn away before anything else could happen.
For the next few minutes you busied yourself snipping away at the bushes as she settled into the pool, splashing and gasping as she did.
She soon called you however.
"Anon?  Can you come here a minute?  I need your opinion on something?"
Internally willing your body to divert blood flow from your crotch, you turn to speak with her.
She stood in the pool, the water up to her waist and with her hands on her hips.
You tried desperately to keep your eyes on hers, but one of the effects of going from warm air to cool water on her body was making itself clear, as in the nubs now poking through her top where her nipples had noticeably stiffened.
Somehow, you kept your eyes averted.
"Yes Jill?  Something you need?"
Her eyes narrowed slightly and her smile turned slightly mischievous.
You remembered asking something similar yesterday in the bathroom, and she obviously did too.
Before you could correct yourself though, she spoke.
"It's been a while since I wore this old thing and I was wondering... do you think it still suits me?"
She held her hands behind her back and turned slightly this way and that as she waited for an answer, this caused her chest to strain against the top slightly and push up her bust.
Something told you it wasn't an unconscious action on her part.
It seemed the tables had turned.
She had listened to your attempt at retreat and instead of accepting, she had turned hunter and was now stalking you carefully, like the lions of old waiting to pounce on some hapless prey.
It would seem the 'lonely widow' you had worried about taking advantage of wasn't planning on letting you get away so easily...
With your heart in your throat, you decide to meet her head on.
"If you want an honest answer?  You look gorgeous."
She blushed at that, but her smile didn't waver.
"Why thank you young man, but tell me..."
She seemed to almost glide to the edge of the pool, leaned on the decking with her elbow, her chin on her hand, and her breasts on the edge of the decking  too as she looked up at you.
"Aren't you all hot and bothered up there in the sunshine, after all that hard work?"
You nod, unable to pull your gaze from her large bust straining against the bikini.
"Would you like to... come cool off in the pool?  With me?"
You clear your throat, now painfully aware of the pressure building in the prison of your pants.
"I would like that..." you start.
"But I didn't bring any swim shorts today..."
Her smile turned downright naughty, showing a number of razor sharp teeth now too.
"Oh that's okay Anon, I won't tell anyone if you don't..."
The little voice in your head that belonged to the doubt, the thoughts that had almost ruined this for you before, gave a final screech of dissent... before you mentally beat it to death with a baseball bat, and started to strip off your clothes.
You were going for a dip in the pool, and the lusty looks that Jill was giving you foretold that you were going to be doing anything but cooling off...
--------------------------------------------------

Chapter 4 - Lip-service

The world had taken on a surreal sort of feel to it in these last few minutes.
Everything had somehow shrunk, or at least ceased to matter anyway.
All you could see was her, standing lazily in the pool and waiting for you to come join her.
While you pulled yourself from the confines of your sweaty work clothes Jill had turned and waded her way to the other side of the pool, her back turned to you in either an attempt to preserve your modesty or perhaps simply to prolong her own anticipation...
When finally you were free, you slipped into the water and made your way over to her.
She didn't turn to meet you or make any other kind of movement as you stopped behind her, instead she stood statue still.
Carefully you reach down and take hold of her hand, turning her towards you slowly.
Despite her posturing just now you could see she was nervous, and that now you were here and ready she was still building up to it.
"Well, here I a-" 
Your words were cut short as Jill suddenly reached up and locked her lips with yours, forestalling any further attempt to speak and tickling your chin with fur.
You just stood there for a moment, marveling at the sweet taste of her black lips and reaching with your hands to pull her closer.
She again interrupted your actions however, this time with a little yelp of surprise and hopping backwards out of your grasp.
Blinking in confusion, it took you a second to work out what had happened...
She was smiling behind her hand as she tried to stifle a giggle, a blush once again showing through her fur.
"S-sorry!" she giggled.
"You took me by surprise a little there, I didn't expect it to be so..."
As she trailed off you caught her meaning.
She had jumped back after you had pulled her closer, and accidentally given her a jab with your very much erect member.
"Oops... my bad."
She giggled again but now looked down towards the water, specifically the patch around your crotch.
It didn't take long for her to once more close the gap between you, but instead of going back for another kiss she kept her gaze downwards.
You were starting to feel a bit self conscious now between her giggling and now silent staring...
"Jill?  If this is going too fast then..."
She snapped her eyes away from your submerged junk and back up, but her expression wasn't that of someone having second thoughts, it was a mix of nerves and... hunger.
"Anon?" she asked quietly.
You raise an eyebrow and wait.
"It's been... quite a while since I was, um, intimate with anyone and well..."
She held her hands behind her back and slowly turned this way and that again, like she had before, giving you a sterling view of her pushed out breasts.
"Ive never actually been with a... human before, either, so I was wondering..."
She looked oddly innocent to your eyes at this point, like a girl asking if she could have a cookie out of the jar knowing full well dinner was almost ready.
But there was nothing innocent about what she wanted.
"Can I get to know it first?"
You blink.
"It?"
She reached out and brushed the tip of your still erect manhood gently with a velvety finger.
"Ive never felt a human one before..."
You smile, before leaning over and planting a kiss on her wide nose.
"By all means Jill." you whisper.  
"Take your time."
You remembered from your time cleaning the pool that there was a shelf, or step like structure to the side under the waterline.
It was supposed to serve as a seat up against the side where a swimmer could sit and rest without having to actually leave the pool or worry about sliding down below the surface.
It would serve as a comfortable spot for you to rest while Jill did her 'exploring'.
You sat with your back against the edge of the pool and your head resting against the decking, while Jill sat next to you, her eyes alive with excitement.
She didn't wait for an invite, opting to instead reach out as soon as you were settled and gently grab your cock.
You took a quick involuntary breath as her padded palm and fingers wrapped themselves around you, the warmth of her hand contrasting against the cool water.
She started by giving it a gentle squeeze, and then lifting her grip slowly upwards along your length.
She watched the distorted show through the rippling surface, unable to see it clearly but contented to feel her way around.
As she reached the head she finally spoke.
"Oh my..." she purred.
"Its smoother than I thought it would be... and there's no sheath or anything, its all just... there."
You gasped as she probed the head, causing her to recoil slightly.
She smiled at you sheepishly.
"Oops, got a bit carried away..."
After a few more experimental squeezes and caresses, her smile turned mischievous.
"Hmm, I think I need to give it a test drive before I go all in..."
Before you could ask what she meant, her grip clamped down on your throbbing member solidly.
Her smile widened and she started to move her hand up and down, slowly at first but with soon increasing speed and intensity.
You could but hold on to the edges of the shelf underneath as she pumped your manhood, clumsily at first but with improving technique as she watched your reactions.
"Oh shiiii..."
You were very much enjoying yourself, but as you felt the heat rising within you had an odd thought.
"Wait, Jill... if we do this here then its all going to get in the water..."
A stupid thought for a guy getting a handjob from an amorous cougar, but considering you had spent a full day cleaning this bastard of a pool...
She giggled again before slowing her strokes.
"Really?" she whispered, a mock expression of concern painting her face.
"If only I had someone to call and come back tomorrow to clean the pool again for me..."
You returned the smile.
Instead of resuming her work however, she stopped and released her grip of you.
Your disappointment didn't have time to manifest however, when she instead climbed over and sat herself down on your lap, straddling your thighs and looking you right in the face.
She was a bit shorter than you but propped up on your lap as she was you were given a glorious view of those barely restrained breasts, still pressing tightly against the bikini top.
Her look had become more serious but the half smile on her face told you just what was on her mind next.
"Do you want me Anon?" she asked, the nerves from before finally seeming to have fled.
You smile a little wider, and as you answer reach your hands around behind and grab hold of her pleasingly firm ass cheeks.
"You know I do Jill." you whisper.
Very slowly and deliberately, she reached down to her side and started to pull on one of the strings securing the bikini bottoms.
Just one sharp tug and then...
"Mom!  Where are you?"
She stiffened on your lap painfully, a look of shear panic on her face.
"Oh no!  Its Chad!" she hissed.
"I can't let him see me like this!  We have to-"
It was too late to leave however, as Chad's footsteps could be heard grumpily stomping around the side of the house towards the back garden, he would be here in seconds.
Thinking quickly, she pushed you downwards until your head was below the edge of the decking and out of sight.
Thankfully your chin was still just above the surface, another couple of inches though or if any particularly large ripples came your way then you would be breathing pool water.
Reaching over quickly, she grabbed her robe and towel, and thew them over your own discarded clothing to hide them from view.
Then, with your sides now pinned between her thighs, she leaned over onto the decking at the edge of the pool with crossed arms and blocked any signs of your head from sight.
So when Chad arrived, all he could see from his position was his mother, in the pool and resting at the edge closest to him.
You on the other hand were out of sight as long as he didn't come around to the side, but trapped uncomfortably under Jill and with your face pressed firmly between her lower cleavage and the side of the pool.
It seemed you had yet again been cock blocked by an unknowing Chad.
If you managed to get out of this without being found out, or getting a broken neck, somebody was going to pay.
Dearly.
--------------------------------------------------

For the next five minutes you sat there silently, partially smothered by fur, pinned in place and with a steadily deflating boner.
Chad had stomped on round in search of his mother, apparently having been blown out by his friends in whatever plan they had.
So he was home much earlier than planned and bemoaning his poor social life, much to your irritation.
To be fair, Jill had tried to get rid of him, not too keen on the idea perhaps of him finding you where you currently were.
"I'm sorry to hear your plans didn't work out today sweetie but... I'm just in the middle of a swim right now and-"
He hadn't taken any notice though.
"Yeah whatever..." he grunted.
"Like you can actually swim!"
He had then proceeded to drone on about his flaky friends, how he could do better, how they were lucky to even know him, and so on... and on...
You began to despair that he might never stop, that you may end up trapped here in the water, slowly pickling in the chlorine...
Jill for her part had sagged slightly too, the realization that she might just be here for the long haul sinking in.

It was as Chad was listing off the reasons his friends should treat him with more respect that the idea struck you.
A terrible idea, one that would almost certainly land you in trouble, one that would undoubtedly end in disaster...
But you were dying here, trapped up against this needy cougar and unable to move.
Her scent cut through the treated pool water, through the sun cream smothering her fur, like an exotic spice pulling at the edges off your senses that you couldn't quite identify but desperately needed more of.
Your hands were still firmly clamped on her ass cheeks, in part helping her stay in position but not supporting her fully...
Time for some fun.
Very slowly, very carefully, you un-cup one of her cheeks and move your hand up to her side.
She sensed the movement and tensed up slightly, not sure what you were up to but unable look.
All the explanation, all the warning you would give was a soft kiss just above her furry navel, one that sent a small shiver through her poised form.
You felt your way towards the first string securing her bikini bottoms, careful not to move to quickly and cause a splash or too many ripples.
A little tug and... you felt it come loose.
Jill's thighs tightened their grip on you as she reacted, but she couldn't do much else without drawing Chad's attention.
You reached up and tugged at the string on her other hip, and much like the first it came away with ease.
She was positively quivering now...
Carefully, you pulled at the rear of her bottoms, and slowly dragged them out from between her legs.
The Way she shivered told you that it had the desired effect on her, the feeling of the smooth material dragging across her intimates so very deliberately...
Chad had continued to bitch and moan throughout this process and apparently without noticing any change in Jill.
Emboldened, you continued.
You slowly began to trace the fingers of your right hand downwards along her ass cheek, heading specifically for the place that occupied your thoughts.
All you had to do was follow the natural curves of her body and aim for the growing source of heat at the point between her legs.
The point of no return arrived quickly, and announced by the painful squeeze around your sides.
You felt your way to her pussy, stopping only when you felt where the fur thinned slightly and the heat was at its most intense.
That and when you felt her 'lower lips' quiver at your touch, and the rest of her nearly convulse in response.
Your advance stalled as you heard Chad halt his grumbling, worried that you had caused some noticeable outward reaction on Jill.
You needn't have worried however.
"Mom?" he asked uncertainly.
"You look kinda weird..."
Jill was on full damage control, not missing a beat.
"N-no dear, I'm fine, the water is just a bit chilly is all now that I've stopped swimming."
"Why don't you go get us a drink from the kitchen or something hmm?"
It was no use though.
Chad simply laughed cruelly.
"See, this is why old people shouldn't swim!" he chortled, before continuing on with his monologue to his captive audience.
In response, you gave Jill's ass a quick but reassuring squeeze with your other hand, making sure she knew you at least thought of her differently...
Before continuing your assault on her womanhood.

With your target located, you began to probe with your fingertips.
Slowly tracing across her lower lips and memorizing the outline carefully.
She twitched and shook, but made no sound.
You suspected her face to be a perfectly neutral mask, intent on not alerting her son to your debauchery below the pool's surface.
Round and round your fingers moved, brushing lightly against her furry opening and causing her to squirm above you.
When you felt she had reached the point of ample frustration, you pressed a little closer, and a little harder.
Your fingers now rubbed gently across her lips themselves, parting them slightly for a second before letting them contract back into place.
The effect was felt immediately.
Through your contact with her you felt her heartbeat quicken, the heat from her crotch increased, and her grip on your sides got tighter still.
She was at your mercy however, trapped between an awkward revelation and your persistent ministrations.
You kept on with your teasing, pressing and parting, smoothing and such, making sure to carefully plant a kiss upon her navel every now and again to throw her off your rhythm.
As you probed slightly deeper though, you hit the next milestone.
Your fingertips lightly brushed a small, pulsing nub of flesh, now no longer hidden away and open to your advances.
The way she suddenly arched her back and hiccuped in surprise told you all you needed...
You had hit upon her clit.
Your fingers stopped their work as the water splashed around her.
"What was that?" 
Chad had noticed.
You felt her tense as she tried to explain her outburst away.
"N-nothing dear, just some hiccups..."
They remained silent for a moment, with Jill holding her breath, Chad attempting to think and you... absentmindedly massaging her one still cupped ass cheek.
Soon Chad gave up thinking and carried on his talking, so you carried on your teasing.
You were careful not to give her clit too much attention just yet, as you didn't want to break her down completely in front of Chad.
But you fully intended to take her right to the edge.
As you sank two of your fingers slowly inside of her fully throbbing and overstimulated pussy, you felt her hold her breath and shake.
It was as if she was suppressing a shout, or perhaps a scream, or maybe even a slutty little moan.
You worked your way up to the knuckle, rubbing against her rippling walls within and now lightly touching upon her clit with your thumb.
It was difficult going from the angle you were sitting, but the reactions you could feel twisting through her as she sat tightly pressed against you...
You were now back fully erect and made of diamonds.
As you felt her suppress another moan, she finally broke.
You hadn't quite brought her to her limit yet, but she couldn't keep the charade up in front of her son any longer and stay sane.
"L-listen Chad h-honey, why don't you go into t-town and go do something hmm?"
Chad, by the sounds of him, didn't like being interrupted, but she was getting beyond desperate now.
"It's a b-beautiful day so you r-really shouldn't be spending it couped up in the house like a loner."
You heard the sound of her claws digging into the decking as she spoke, struggling to stay calm as you planted more kisses along her stomach fur.
"Oh Mom..." he began.
"Don't tell me what to do with my own time yeah?  I'm not a kid anymore..."
"Damn it Chad!" she suddenly shouted, striking him silent and causing you to halt your attentions in shock.
"Just this once do as you're told!  I have plans today and I need the house to myself so just get out and don't come back until later!  Got it!?!"
The shocked silence from Chad told you that he wasn't used to her actually answering him back like this, but he got the message loud and clear.
"Okay... fine." he grumbled.
"I need some money for the -"
She didn't let him finish, perhaps because you had returned both hands to her ass and was squeezing at it teasingly.
"There's a fifty in my purse!  Now just go already!"
He didn't need telling again.
Quickly scampering to the house to retrieve the money then out and away...
Leaving you once more alone with Jill in the pool...
--------------------------------------

When the coast was finally clear, she seemed to relax.
For a second at least...
She remained in position over you, breathing heavily and shaking slightly but not shouting.
You decided to give her ass an exploratory squeeze.
"Hey Jill?  Are you okay up there?"
Her reaction was swift and not what you had expected.
With a strength truly surprising of her size, she suddenly reached down and grabbed you under your armpits and pulled you solidly into into a proper sitting position to face her.
Her normally serene face was a mask of conflicting emotions, shifting between anger and confusion the most, but with a definite undercurrent of something you could only describe as a crazed hunger.
"What..." she began, before quickly stalling.
"Why were you..."
She kept attempting to start berating you, but each time something stopped her and she had to try again.
Until finally, in seeming defeat, she sat backwards, perhaps no longer able to stay in position after kneeling like that for so long...
As she sat down however, she froze, and stared at you with once more wide eyes.
She had sat down directly onto your waiting cock, and halted with your tip very much knocking at her back door.
You watched the change take her as if in slow motion.
The conflicting emotions melted from her face, and left that crazed needy look to firmly take root in her eyes.
"Fuck me." she whispered.
You blinked, taken aback.
"Fuck me!" 
It was a growl this time, and it wasn't a request.
It wasn't even a demand.
It was a declaration.
Without any further thought or ceremony, she pushed herself backwards and hilted herself on you in one sharp movement, her already thoroughly aroused and swollen pussy greedily devouring your full manhood completely.
You grunted in surprise, the force of her hasty action causing a small jolt of pain.
She didn't give you time to complain though, and released a ragged, deep moan right into your ear.
Then she was off, like a prize-winning jockey at the races, riding your cock like her life depended on it.
You could only but grab two handfuls of her furry ass and hold on as she rose and fell upon you.
Somehow, the water didn't slow or hinder her movements at all as she fucked you, seemingly overpowering even the scientific laws of water pressure and resistance in her need to have her way.
She leaned back a little further but kept her hands on your shoulders to brace herself, giving you full view of those buxom breasts as they bounced along with her movements.
As the fabric holding the bikini faltered under her relentless pounding, you bore witness to her bosom breaking free, as her generous melon sized breasts erupted from their prison and bounced hypnotically before you.
You moaned and released one of her cheeks, instead choosing to fill your hand with her furry breast and squeeze at her dark and pointed nipple.
It didn't take long however before this manic burst of intimacy came to its conclusion.
You had brought her most of the way with your teasing before, so she soon reached the end of her endurance and came... hard.
You knew not by the feel of her hungry snatch clamping down upon you for a final time, or by the way her grip on your shoulders tightened.
It was when she finally let loose that slutty moan that she had been so desperately holding in earlier.
She threw her head back and almost roared her pleasure out into the hot summer sky, screaming as you too let loose and pumped her full of your seed.
You vaguely wondered if Chad was far enough away so that he didn't hear it, or if he wasn't then would he recognize the voice...

When you were both finally spent, you simply lay out upon the grass, eager to be out of the now somewhat soiled water and in each others arms.
She hadn't found her voice yet, having screamed herself silent, so you spoke instead.
"That was... amazing..."
It wasn't much of a speech, but you weren't doing all that much better than her right now truth be told.
She simply hugged you a little closer and nuzzled her face a little tighter into your neck, purring softly.
You didn't know if cougars could purr, or if they even should, but it was a pleasant feeling none the less.
As you both lay there drying in the sun, a thought occurred to you.
"Wait, I think we got a bit carried away there... I wasn't wearing any, you know... protection?"
She looked up at you sleepily, a momentary flash of concern marring her otherwise glowing face, but it quickly passed and she resumed her nuzzling.
You figured out why.
"Oh right, I'm human and you're not so we don't have to worry about that, right?"
She just purred a little louder in response.
As the afternoon began to wane, you knew you couldn't stay for much longer, not without Chad coming back and finding you at least, so it would soon be time to go.
Using one hand to prop yourself up, you use the other to smooth the fur of her face.
"Guess I better make a move."
Jill looked up at you sadly, knowing all too well your reasons why.
Yet you kept your smile.
"Don't suppose you need me to come round tomorrow to see to... any other jobs around here?"
She replaced her frown with that naughty smile from before, the one you could really get used to seeing, and found her voice.
"Oh I'm sure I can think of something around here that needs... doing." she purred, putting extra emphasis on the last word.
Leaning back down, you kiss her once more and drink deeply of those sweet lips.
Somehow, you could see this little gardening job becoming full time...
-----------------------------------------------

Chapter 5 - Perks of the Job
 
That night you had wandered off home in a daze.
You didn't take in any of the usual scenery or passersby as you walked, the inevitable weight of despair that always landed upon your shoulders as you came to your trailer simply missed and kept on going as you dreamily walked through the door...
Even the cramped little space you were forced to call home failed to bring you down as you dropped onto your bedding, a smile still hanging happily from your lips.
Everything else drifted away as your thoughts circled Jill and the day you had shared together.
Yesterday she had been a distraction, a tool to be used against Chad in a tit for tat that shouldn't have ever left school, just a nice older woman who you got a kick out of flirting with.
Today however she had changed things, she had beckoned you into the pool and lit a flame somewhere deep inside of you.
She was not your first, as there had been others towards the end of high school.
There had been Jessica, a nice but bookish sort of girl who you had met while studying.
She had been one of the few other humans at your school and it had actually come as a surprise to both of you to find one another in the same library, looking up the same subjects and to be so close in age too.
After some time dating over the summer, you had gone back to hers one evening and experimented a little, exploring each other's bodies before finally going all the way.
It had been slow, clumsy, neither of you knowing quite what to do and worrying about disappointing the other, but at the time it had been special.
It didn't last though, and she soon broke it off to focus on her own studies and eventually left for pastures new with barely a second thought.
Then there had been Gigi, your first anthro girlfriend.
She had been one of the many anthro antelope who had colonized the town some generations before, tall, thin, wiry...
You later learned that she was something of the town bicycle however, having given more than a few other boys a ride.
It had been a quick fumble behind the old community center, lots of grabbing, pinching and even a bit of biting (from her) as she had you press her up against the wall and take her roughly.
Turns out she was just curious, having never 'had' a human boy before.
Once she got what she wanted she left, with barely a peck on the cheek in thanks before moving on to the next species of guy she wanted to try out.
You learned later she had tried it on with a horse guy.
It hadn't ended well.
The story had been on the news for weeks, there had even been a court case, but in the end he got off pretty lightly when his lawyers brought up her track record and they claimed her demise was 'youthful misadventure', and not the massive internal bleeding as detailed on the autopsy.
You made a mental note to drop some flowers off at the cemetery when you next had a chance...
What was different however, between your first 'love', your first fling, and Jill, was that sense of need.
When you had been with Jill, after you had worked her into a frenzy...
She had come at you with an almost primal hunger, riding you with an intensity that had shaken you to your core.
She had wanted you, and made you feel wanted, desired, needed.
Perhaps it was because she was older than you, that she was lonely and starved of the attention you had offered...
Perhaps she just wanted to use you to scratch an itch left too long out of reach.
A bit of fun.
Yet you couldn't deny the almost electric sense of excitement you had felt when she looked at you, the desire you had felt and your own need to give her as thorough a seeing to as you could.
It was that need she had of you, and the way she had simply held you afterwards purring sweetly.
There had been no awkward looks, no quick retrieval of discarded panties and a sharp exit stage left.
She had taken all you had, given all of hers in return, and then just... held you.
It was certainly not the quick roll in the hay you had envisioned, and you hadn't expected to be sitting here afterwards obsessing over it like this either.
She had handed you your pay packet after you had dressed, leaning against the frame of the sliding kitchen door with the almost sleepy expression of a woman who had been through a rejuvenating spa treatment, and huskily asked -
"So... you coming back tomorrow?  Those hedges aren't done and there might be a few... other things, that I might want you to do for me..."
You had agreed, before heading off home.
Now all you could think about was what she might want tomorrow?
Would it be just tomorrow or would she ask you to come back again the day after?
How long would it take before you finally scratched that itch of hers and she stopped asking?
Shaking your head, you decide to leave that particular problem for whenever it decided to actually come instead of thinking about it too much now.
This was only supposed to be a bit of fun anyway, so might as well enjoy the ride and worry about the bus home later.
You made yourself a spartan supper, caught up on a bit of your prep reading, and then called it a night.
You tried not to think about what the implications would be if tomorrow you went to work, spent the day seeing to Jill instead of actually working and then got paid anyway.
Would that make you not so much a handyman but more of a...
You drift into an uneasy sleep, haunted by dreams where you are dancing about on a stage wearing nothing but a sparkly g-string, while a pride of anthro lion women jeered and threw money at your feet...
-----------------------------------------------------------------

The following morning you once more arrived at Jill's house early.
Thanks to last night's dream of actual cat calling feline women you had woken with the desire to actually get on with some work and earn your pay properly rather than change your job title...
As before, no one was around.
The clippers were where you had left them yesterday before getting... distracted, so you decide to pick up where you had left off.
Despite the forecast for today having been slightly cooler than yesterday you could already feel it was going to be another scorcher.
What little dry breeze there was seemed to have blown itself out and the air had fallen still and humid, the sky seemed to glow a powder blue as the sun worked on its ascent, with not a single cloud to hinder its glare.
So it wasn't long until you found yourself pining for the sight of Jill, making her way to you across the grass with that sultry sway of hers, and carrying a glass of lemonade to quench your growing thirst...
Yet when the door at the back of the house eventually did slide open, you found it was a far less welcome sight come to greet you.
It was Chad.
You had already been at it for roughly an hour in the rising heat so you really hoped that whatever he wanted was going to be short, shorter than your temper at least anyway.
He walked out onto the grass wearing his familiar football jersey, squinting at you in the bright sunlight and made his way over.
To be fair he looked just as displeased to see you as you did him, but he had something to say so you stopped your clipping and waited.
"Morning Chad." you say with a little wave, the memory of  what you were up to in the pool yesterday robbing you somewhat of your intended bile.
He stopped mid sneer, taken aback slightly by your cheery greeting.
"Uh, morning I guess. "
You stood and waited for him to regain his bearings.
"Something you need or what?"
Your prompt seemed to help him regain his composure.
"Yeah actually, I've got a message for you from my mom." he muttered, clearly unhappy at being today's designated messenger pigeon.
"She said that she had to go out early today so she couldn't say hi or something, but she'd be back later with another job for you if you stick around."
You nod, understanding the message hidden within that Chad was blissfully unaware of.
"Thanks, that's nice of her to let me know.  I guess I'll see what she needs later then."
You turn to get back to work, but as you resume your clipping you realize that he is still standing there, a troubled look interrupting his normally surly features.
"Was there something else?" you enquire uncertainly.
He fiddled with his hands for a moment before answering.
"Did you..." he started, but lapsed back into silence again.
You consider telling him to just go away but something in his demeanor stayed your tongue.
"My mom was acting really weird yesterday, like first she was acting like a total bitch but then-"
He stopped again, uncharacteristically uncertain in himself.
"Then last night she was like, really spaced out.  I mean like she was on drugs or something."
You wait, but soon loose patience when he didn't continue.
"Why are you telling me this Chad?"
He jumped slightly.
"I just think it's weird." he grumbled.
"Did something... happen yesterday?  Did you see something or did she say anything strange?"
Oh dear, it looked like he was starting to get suspicious.
He had no idea what was actually going on here, but he knew something was up.
Not completely stupid then.
"Really?" you ask innocently.
"I hadn't really noticed anything out of the ordinary.  I mean she went for a swim yesterday so I gave the bushes a rest and got to work elsewhere..."
He sighed in frustration.
"It only started after you showed up.  If I find out you've been bothering her or anything I'll-"
"You'll what, Chad?" you interrupt suddenly, your voice low and even.
He stopped, that same look of uncertainty from your last encounter returning.
"I'm just here doing my job, doing only what your mom is asking me to do.  If she's bothered about something then it's certainly not by what I'm doing."
He looked poised to argue, but there was nothing to argue about.
He knew nothing and you weren't going help him on that front.
You shrug and return to the bushes, snip-snipping away while he stood wordlessly.
As he turned to go however, you stopped and spoke once more, your eyes not leaving the bush.
"Oh and Chad?  I hope your friends don't ditch you again today.  This old town is a lonely place to wander around by yourself."
He spun on his heel, you weren't looking but you could imagine the confused expression on his face.
"How-" he began, but you didn't answer.
You instead carried on with your cutting, whistling a merry little tune seemingly without a care, and nearly pulled a rib trying not to laugh.
It was a long few moments before he slowly stalked away, muttering dark nothings to himself.
He had to be wondering how you knew about that.
Had his mom told you?  Was she actively sharing his private comings and goings with you?
Was there some other way you knew?
The questions would hopefully mess with him for a while, much to your amusement.
He had no way of knowing of course that you had overheard his grumbling directly while hiding under his mother's tits and fondling her unmentionables.
Heh.
---------------------------------------------------------------

It was a good few hours later when Jill returned.
It had given you ample time to work up a mighty sweat but also to finish off the bushes and even the tree.
Suffice to say, when she came to find you your soaked shirt lay discarded on the grass and you were all but ready to call it a day.
Yet you had remained, waiting not only for the day's pay, but also for this mysterious other job she had for you.
She stalked her way across the grass, hips and tail seeming to flow and sway confidently with each step.
She was different you noticed to the last few days, not only in her demeanor but her looks.
Whereas previously she had been dressed in her day to day 'mom' clothes, not really trying to impress but oozing with milf appeal, now she wore a really quite smart skirt, blouse and blazer combo and had put on some makeup.
She had applied some lavender eye shadow, a touch of red lip gloss, some dangling earrings from her round fluffy ears, and the way the fur seemed to shine and curl at the tips of her cheeks suggested she had gone and had it treated.
She really did look quite amazing all spruced up, even if a part of you preferred the raw look of her going all natural in that tight little bikini.
As she approached you greeted her with a wide smile, your first genuine one of the day.
"Ah, there you are." you chuckle.
"I was beginning to think you were going to give me the slip today after all."
She flashed you a smile of her own, one which showcased those big fangs of hers, now framed by the line of red lip gloss and giving her a very primal sort of quality for a second.
"Oh I'm sorry for keeping you waiting Anon, but I had to go out and sort out a few things in town."
By the looks of it one of those things had been a trip to the beauty salon.
Wait...
Was that for your benefit?
"Wow." you say with a grin, and then elicit a blush from her with a wolf whistle.
"You're positively glowing today Jill!  You do something with your fur?"
She ducked her head to the side as her blush deepened, but quickly returned her gaze to yours.
"Why thank you Anon." she purred.
"I might have had a quick spruce up while I was out." 
You continued to trade pleasantries for a few minutes, with her commenting on your gardening and you on the weather and so on.
It was a surreal sort of moment, particularly with how vigorously you had both been all over each other yesterday, but the reason you played along instead of letting your hands do the talking was a certain sneaking suspicion.
One that proved itself to be true soon enough.

From the house once again marched Chad, dressed in a slightly looser fitting shirt, baggy pants, and with  a jangling gold chain around his neck.
He had given you the impression earlier that he would be leaving after passing on his mother's message and his little Q&A session, but it would seem that he had been lurking around the house while you worked outside.
This was why Jill had decided to keep from grabbing you like her eyes told you she wanted to.
Had he been keeping an eye on you perhaps?  Convinced that you might sneak into the empty house had he left and steal whatever crap he hoarded away inside?
He needed have worried, not about petty theft anyway.
You were already well into a very different heist, and had already got your hands all over your prize...
He stopped short of the two of you and tapped away at his phone, keeping his eyes off of the two of you.
"Yeah I'm off now to the concert with the guys, probs won't be back until morning so don't wait up."
You catch Jill's eyes quickly flick over at you and back again.
He turned to leave, but stopped suddenly and looked up.
"Oh yeah, I dumped some stuff in the laundry that I'll need tomorrow so you know what to do."
He then left, walking out across the grass and away around the side of the house.
The sound of an impatiently honking horn told you that his ride was already there waiting for him.
"Have a nice time!" Jill shouted out after him, waving and standing on her toes.
But he didn't so much as look back, let alone respond.

After he had gone and the coast was clear, you looked over to Jill, wondering perhaps if she was thinking what you were thinking.
Empty house for the night, no interruptions...
When you caught her eye she huffed, obviously still annoyed with her son  but quite pleased with the messages you were sending her way.
"Why don't we get in out of this sun for a while hmm?" she asked, a slightly more playful tone to to her voice now that Chad was safely out of the way.
"You look like you could use a cold drink."
You smile, and follow her pleasantly swaying rump and tail to the kitchen.
------------------------------------------------------------

When you got inside to the cool interior, you half expected her to turn and pounce on you like the needy beast she had become yesterday.
As your eyes adjusted from the bright glare of the sun to the comparatively dark interior of the kitchen however, Jill was reacting in a way much further from your expectations.
She had stopped over by the counter and gasped.
It seemed Chad had been busy.
The 'some stuff' as Chad had put it, looked to have actually been about a month's worth of dirty laundry, dumped into a now overflowing laundry basket.
You bore witness to a snapshot of his wasted summer, sweat stained shirts (not from exercise by the looks of it either), a plethora of underwear and socks that had obviously seen more than one use since their last wash, some damp towels from what you suspected were from his bi-weekly shower and more.
He must have decided to empty his room all in one go of all his neglected clothes and left them for Jill to sort.
It wasn't the only thing he had left though either.
The sink was overflowing with dirty dishes, plates, stained cups and glasses and so on, some from today and others with older dried on stains he must have retrieved from his room.
By the overflowing trashcan sat a pizza box, with the remains of what must have been his lunch from earlier left forgotten.
More plates and empty cans on the other counter with the remains of his breakfast and other snacks.
It beggared belief that one guy could make this much of a mess in one go, but somehow Chad had not only managed but excelled himself.
You expected Jill to flip, to get mad, to call him back to clean up his mess or to start promising all the ways she was going to make him sorry when he deigned to return.
Her actual reaction however near broke your heart.
She simply stood there silently, taking in the mess that once was her immaculate kitchen and visibly deflated.
You could see the playful cougar you had followed through the door drain away and leave behind the husk that was  the single mother of a spoilt man-child.
Slowly, she reached up and removed her earrings, shoulders slumped and defeated, before finding her voice.
"It looks like I'm going to busier tonight than I thought I'd be, so it would be best you go home now and leave me to it."
Her voice was flat, resigned.
"Wait there a moment while I get your pay packet, I left it over here this morning ready."
She walked over to one of the cleaner counters and started searching through the shelf above it.
You didn't quite know what to say.
Your family had been a big one, with chaos generally breaking out in the kitchen of your own smaller home as you all scrambled for breakfast in the morning or supper in the evening.
Yet you had all been raised to respect your parents, fighting amongst yourselves for the precious attention they had to split between you but always making sure to do your chores and help where you could.
Chad had his mother all to himself, but instead of cherishing it, he abused it thoroughly.
You were shaken from your musing by a string of quiet curses.
Jill was frantically searching the shelf now but obviously finding nothing.
Chad must have taken your pay with him to his outing, a bit of unearned spending money at the concert.
As Jill slumped downwards, bending over burying her head in her arms upon the counter, you decide enough is enough.
She didn't hear you approach, instead focusing on suppressing her sobbing.
She felt you arrive though.
You came up behind her and slowly slipped your arms around her waist, causing her to jump and gasp in surprise.
Desperately attempting to regain her composure, she tried to pull away, wiping her eyes quickly with her hands in the process.
You held her in place however.
"A-anon-" she stuttered, her breath shaking.
"Not n-now, I've got so much to do and-"
"Shhhh." you breath into her ear.
"Just listen for a second."
She shook slightly but otherwise didn't move, so you rest your chin upon the top of her head and begin to speak.
"Do you see what's happening here?" you whisper.
"He's trying to get back at you for yesterday, he could see that you were happy about something and annoyed you told him to leave you alone, so he's gone out of his way to punish you tonight."
She didn't respond, but let out a little sob.
You continue.
"You spend all your time looking after him, running at his every beck and call, but when do you get time for you hmm?"
She didn't answer.
"How about..."
"How about you say enough is enough and take the night off?"
She stiffened slightly, having unconsciously relaxed into your embrace as you had been speaking.
"How about tonight you let someone else look after you for a change?"
Your voice had dropped back down to the barest whisper, and you move your lips close enough to her ear so that her fur tickled your skin.
"How about you let me look after you tonight?"
She shook in your arms, with either apprehension, or perhaps desire.
"But..." she muttered.
"Chad took your pay... I can't even-"
You silence her final protest with a gentle kiss to her ear, the heady smell of her perfume now filling your senses.
"I didn't wait around after finishing my work today for the money Jill." you tease, squeezing her a little tighter.
"I waited for you."
With that, she melted into your arms fully, snuffling away her tears happily and trying to talk.
You just hold her closer, and let her feel the growing bulge in your pants press hungrily into her lower back.
-------------------------------------------------------------------
Chapter 6 - Call of the Cougar

For a time, you simply stood there, holding the purring cougar to your chest and enjoying the way she pressed herself back against you.
She felt the hardened shape of your desire throbbing for her, pressing through both of your clothes.
When you did finally loosen your grip, it was only to angle yourself down slightly and bring your lips level with her neck.
Enjoying the feel of her scented fur, you start planting kisses along the nape of her neck, deliberately working your way around towards her shoulder.
Your arms remained loosely around her, your hands softy caressing her fur through her blouse, with one rhythmically working its way upwards towards the bulge of her breasts.
Jill wordlessly allowed herself to melt into you, occasionally pressing her head backwards to rub lovingly against the side of your jaw and neck, while her own hands remained folded across the top of your arms, following their movements as you held and smoothed her.
She let out a little moan between her purrs as your hand finally reached the swell of her chest, as you firmly cupped a handful of her pleasingly soft breast and gave a little squeeze.
You didn't linger however, much to her initial disappointment, but it was only so that your wandering hand could reach its next target.
The uppermost of her still fastened blouse buttons.
She huffed and sighed happily as you began to pop each button, and as your other hand made it's way a little lower than her stomach, with the tips of your fingers pressing under the waistline of her skirt.
As the last of the buttons succumbed, you stopped your caressing and teasing long enough to slip her blazer from her shoulders, before returning your to your efforts to pry another of those delicious little moans from her.
It was as you once more cupped one of her gloriously full breasts that you realized something, she was of course wearing a bra but it didn't quite feel the way you expected.
The fabric supporting her bust felt almost... lacy.
Then, much to your own disappointment this time, she stopped you.
"Wait a second." she whispered breathlessly, but staying in your embrace.
"When I went out today I... got you something.  A present, sort of."
You paused, suddenly caught off guard.
"You got me a present?"
Apart from the obligatory birthday or Christmas with the family, no one had given you anything resembling a gift for quite some time, so you didn't really know how to react.
She turned around in your arms and rested against the counter, giving you a full view of the contents of her now open blouse.
Her 'bra' was in fact damn near see through red lingerie.
Red lace intricately woven into a floral pattern that just about covered the dark outlines of her hardened nipples.
"Oh my..." was just about all you could say, but the hungry grin now playing across your face told her all she needed to know.
Dipping slightly, she pushed her breasts together and wiggled side to side, giving you a tantalizing show of her moving cleavage.
As you reached out to claim your prize she blocked you with her hands, and then turned back around giggling.
"Uh-uh Anon!" she smirked over her shoulder.
"You haven't finished unwrapping your present yet...
Suppressing a growl that rose from some forgotten primal place within, you turn your attention to her rump, that she was now swaying alluringly at you.
Her smart skirt was close fitting, with the hem coming down to just above her knees and a gap left for her now swishing tail to poke out comfortably.
There was a clasp just above the tail hole, where you could unclip and pull the whole thing slowly down.
But you had another idea.
Just below the tail you could see another clasp, and a cleverly hidden zipper that went all the way down and looked like little more than another seam.
You work the clasp, and then slowly draw the zipper down, making sure she knew exactly what you were doing.
"Anon?" she asked, sounding confused.
"It's the other one silly, above the tail!"
You carried on, ignoring her half hearted complaints, and finished unzipping.
The skirt parted to reveal her shapely cheeks, sandy fur now uncovered and free.
You give her left cheek a quick squeeze, catching her around the waist again with your other other arm as she straightened in surprise.
"D-do you like your present?" she asked shakily.
Bringing your face back to her neck, you give another series of quick kisses.
"Shhh, I'm still unwrapping..." you whisper.
Releasing her, you focus downwards once more.
You see that the bottom half of your 'present' was an equally see through set of red lacy panties, one that rode up between her cheeks almost like a thong, and stopped just below her tail.
With care, so you don't strain the remaining clasp, you pull her skirt upwards, up until they bunched over her hips, giving you full access finally to her scantily clad nethers.
Perhaps seeing what you were planning, she slowly leaned forwards until she was bent over and leaning upon the kitchen counter.
Her tail was once more swishing side to side, hitting against you almost impatiently.
Looking down, you saw where the lace of the panties followed downwards through the valley of her ass cheeks towards your prize.
A slip of slightly thicker, silken material hid her pussy from view, but the soaking wet fabric revealed just how she was feeling right now.
Much like a kid at Christmas, eager to run downstairs and find the goodies under the tree, you had run out of patience and couldn't wait any longer.
With her rump presented to you and waiting, you quickly unbuckle your pants and pull your manhood free.
You reach down and pull the soaking panties to the side rather than down, she had gone out especially to pick them out for you so it wouldn't do to discard them so quickly...
With her dripping lips exposed she shuddered and shook in anticipation.
You had to actually grab her tail too with the way it was swishing and pull it to the side.
She gasped as you pressed the head of your member against her waiting lips, the heat and wetness begging you to go all in but waiting for one last thing.
"D-do it!" she all but squeaked, the anticipation almost driving her mad.
Resting both of your hands on her hips, you bend forwards slightly so that she can hear you.
"You're the boss..." you whisper, and slowly push inside.

You had resolved to start slow this time, not that the wild ride she'd given you in the pool was in any way bad, but it was all over so quickly in a mad rush of frantic activity and need.
Whereas this time, you wanted to take your time and enjoy it more.
No, that wasn't it, not completely.
You wanted to make sure that she enjoyed it too.
For some reason, you wanted, no, needed her to.
So as you pressed in through her hot folds you stopped, leaving her hissing and muttering from her position bent over the counter, and pulled out a little.
The sensation of her hungry wet snatch gripping at you, desperately trying to pull you back in deeper was almost enough for you to give in and let loose, but you endured.
Before leaving her completely, you push back in again, slowly but that much deeper.
Her muttering became a low moan as she felt you dig deeper inside of her, and you felt her try and push back against you to take yet more.
From her position however she had little leverage, her legs spread apart upon the floor with her arms folded under her head, so she was forced to go at your speed.
Not that she wasn't enjoying herself of course.
You continued your slow advances, eliciting a deeper and longer moan with each advance you made within, until finally you were all in.
As your hips met her rump, you let out your own gasp, the exertion of holding your desire back taking its own toll.
It was time for more.
You had tried to keep a mental map yesterday while exploring her with your fingers, so that you had an idea of where her more sensitive parts were and what had the bigger effect on her.
At the time you hadn't had the opportunity to put any of your findings to use, not with the way she had come at you, but now?
She was in a different position today however, so compensating, you got to experimenting.
Upping your speed a touch, you began in earnest, aiming so that with each thrust you were hitting downward, or towards her 'front'.
At first you got only her usual reaction, panting and gasping as she took your length needily, but you wanted more.
So you pressed to the side slightly, first hitting a bit shallower and then deeper, gauging her reaction every time to see what she did.
It only took a few minutes surprisingly before you found it, her shangrila.
With a panting gasp you pressed deep, the skin of your hips slapping into her ass cheeks, which was when she moaned.
She went rigid as you hit home, her head shooting up and releasing a deep, almost guttural noise from her mouth as you worked her sensitive insides.
So you hit it again, and again, and again...
She went wild.
Her fur bristled outwards, particularly at a spot just above the base of her tail, and she began to renew her efforts to push against you and join in.
"Oh!  There!  Yes there!" she moaned, her arms now straight and hands holding on to the opposite side of the counter.
You up the tempo, her words and moans causing you to lose some of your control.
She continued to egg you on, shouting louder each time you hit home and uttering formless gibberish as she gave up on coherent speech.
You were desperate not to cum first, needing to blow her mind before your load.
It was as you thought you had claimed victory however that things got weird, when she damn near freaked you out.
She started making the same noises from yesterday, her inner walls suddenly squeezing down on your dick with greater intensity and a moaning scream clawing its way from her throat.
So you hit harder, eager to reach your own release while she experienced hers.
Still working her sensitive areas as a matter of routine now, you thrust harder, faster, panting and cursing as you feel it coming...
Which was when she started to shake, dug her claws into the counter, and screamed.
Not like before, not just an expression of release...
She screamed like nothing you had heard before, a shriek of the damned that rattled the windows in their frames, your teeth in your mouth, the wine glasses in their rack...
You stopped, suddenly afraid you'd hurt her.
"Jill!?!  Are you-"
Your worried words were cut short however when she turned to face you, at angle defying her shape almost, something akin to madness in her eyes.
"Don't you dare stop now!" she nearly roared.
Not needing to be told twice, you redouble your efforts.
You pound her harder and faster, the effort nearly doubling you over, but her screams of primal pleasure driving you on.
Finally, nearly completely exhausted both mentally and physically, you reach your own climax, and pump rope after rope of your seed into her bucking pussy.
Her screams finally subside, devolving into a series of coos and wordless expressions of what you could only translate as bliss as her jerking movements and bucking slowed stopped.
Panting like you had just run a marathon, you pull your aching manhood from the satisfied cougar, the world somehow feeling colder now parted from her burning flesh, despite the summer heatwave.
She stood unsteadily, turning to face you, her eyes half lidded but burning bright.
"Anon..." she whispered.
"That was..."
You give her a tired but contented grin before answering.
"Yeah I know, I mean..."
Further talk fails you both, as Jill simply stood there, gasping for breath, both of her breasts having sprung free from their lacy restraints at some point, and a trickle of something thick and white slowly dripping down her inner thigh.
Instead, you pull her in and lock your lips with hers, the kiss only lasting a couple of seconds as you both still fought for breath, but the sensation lingering long after.
"So..." she said between slowly recovering breaths.
"I think I promised you a drink?"
Nodding wordlessly, you smile and retrieve your pants.
As she grabbed a bottle of something you could only identify as alcoholic, she led you through to the living room, still wearing nothing but her lingerie and unbuttoned blouse, her skirt still hiked up at her hips, leaving barely a sign behind of what had happened.
Nothing except some of her discarded clothes, some unnoticed claw marks on the counter, and a small puddle of unidentified fluids on the kitchen floor.
---------------------------------------

Chapter 7 - A Taste of the Good Life

Following your liaison in the kitchen, Jill led you through to the living room, and instructed you to take a seat.
She quickly nipped back to the kitchen to retrieve some glasses and another bottle before returning to pour you both a drink.
You discovered that the first bottle contained gin, while the second was some more of her lemonade that you had gotten quite used to now.
She had apparently managed to add some ice to the glasses too in her brief return to the kitchen from the refrigerator dispenser, causing them to clink and jingle pleasantly as the drinks mixed within them.
You had seated yourself at the end of a large leather sofa, wearing your pants once more but still shirtless.
Accepting the drink in one hand you try and pull her to you with the other, but she pulled free instead.
Wiggling a raised padded finger at you, she smiled and tutted.
"Not just yet you... I have to go freshen up a bit first."
Before you could argue the case against cleaning herself (as you planned on getting as dirty as possible), she practically skipped back out of the room and headed for the stairs, her buxom breasts bouncing freely all the while.
With a sigh, you instead sit back into the cool material of the sofa and examine your surroundings.
It was a spacious room, much bigger than than your pokey little trailer, but then you suspected the same could be said for pretty much every room in this house.
There was another big sofa angled across the room from yours, and a lone armchair that completed the set of the three piece suite.
On the wall hung a large flat screen tv, bigger than any you had ever had access to growing up and in all likelihood than you would ever own in the future.
Underneath sat a shelf filled with game consoles, blue ray players and networking boxes for various tv and streaming services.
You could imagine Chad sitting himself down here for days at a time, losing himself in the flashing widescreen images and putting on the pounds that now defined him.
The walls were decorated with various hanging tapestries and pictures, all quite tasteful and spoke a little of Jill's personality, except for the space above a large fireplace...
There you noticed was where the family photos were kept.
With some reluctance, you peel yourself from the comfort of the sofa and go in for a closer look.
The first picture you saw was what must have been an old family portrait, as it had a much younger Jill, an infant ball of fluff wearing a baseball cap that must have been Chad, and a much taller figure that could only be the late Mr Fearson.
The mountain lion struck an imposing figure, standing just behind his wife and son, wearing an expensive looking suit and a stern expression on his commanding features.
Every strand of fur, every whisker was immaculate, and he had a hand placed on his young son's shoulder.
You were reminded that unlike their African descended cousins, male mountain lions didn't have a mane, although back in school Chad had gone through a phase where he tried to make his neck fur stand up and had his collar turned out to try and simulate the look.
The young Chad in the photo however was a good deal different to today's version.
He must have only been about four or five, his fur a good deal lighter and fluffier than his present self, and he wore an innocent grin as he looked to the camera, just like any other young kid having his picture taken.
Jill however, although easily recognizable was quite different to her current self.
In the picture she was... thinner, not that she was anything approaching fat today, but she was unmistakably fitter, toned, a swimmers physique.
Her fur was slightly darker than what it was now and she was wearing a blouse and blazer not all that different to what you had partially stripped off of her today.
She too smiled for the camera, but where Chad's was a happy one, perhaps in the middle of shouting "cheese!" to the camera man, Jill's was simply a raising of her lips.
You couldn't help but notice that there wasn't a trace of a smile in her eyes.
When you considered the picture as a whole for a moment, it struck you as overwhelmingly formal.
Just two smartly dressed individuals standing with a child, and only the latter actually showing any emotion.
Moving on to the next few photos you saw more of the same, Mr Fearson's strict expression never wavering, the three standing in identical formations, and only the background changing.
Then he was gone, the line of pictures and memories continuing without him.
Looking closer you saw that the Chad in these latter frames was rarely smiling, at least not at first.
Then they became more playful looking, with Jill standing much closer to him in each shot and apparently tickling him behind the ear or ruffling his fur in an attempt to coax a grin or a giggle.
You could see perhaps where Jill had started fawning over him, trying to comfort him after the loss of his father and inadvertently spoiling him in the process.
But her smiles were real in these ones at least, until the last few where Chad had grown taller than her.
In the last few he stood apart from her, grimacing or pouting to the camera, while she seemed to be wearing the original little smile from the first pictures, the one that didn't reach her eyes.
As you cast your eyes down to some of the lower pictures, you hear footsteps upon the hardwood floor from behind.
--------------------------------------------------------------

While you had been exploring the spacious living room, Jill had been working to freshen herself up like she had said.
The fur between her legs had been left sticky with your mixed love juices, her skirt clumped up around her waist like a bulky belt, and she had slipped out of her lacy bra.
So she had removed the skirt completely, stuffed her rebellious breasts back inside of their slightly too tight prison, and made her way to the first floor bathroom.
Despite wanting to simply curl up with the waiting young man downstairs on the sofa, she had felt the need to clean away the wetness that still clung to the fur of her thighs.
Even if Anon had seen almost every inch of her naked form by now, she still wanted to look and feel her best.
The little shiver of excitement she felt inside when he looked at her, when his eyes took in her (or as she saw herself) tired old form and reflected back some sort of attractive young model...
She needed for him to keep looking at her like that, to keep seeing her like that.
Then maybe she might actually start believing that she did somehow 'still have it'.
She quickly made her way over to the sink, wet a cloth and started dabbing and rubbing at the offending patches of fur.
It wouldn't be as thorough as a shower but she didn't want to keep him waiting too long.
She paused, frozen in her strange squatting position, suddenly realizing that she could have invited him up and perhaps shared a shower, picking up from that first near miss a couple of days ago in this very room.
It was while she was both silently cursing her lack of forethought and debating with herself if it was too late to call him after all, that she felt something drip down from between her parted legs upon the hand she was using to hold the cloth.
With a sigh, she stood up straight and turned on the tap at the sink, ready to wash her now also sticky hand.
As she dropped the cloth to the side of the sink however, she caught sight of what had dropped onto her hand.
It hadn't occurred to her to examine what she had been cleaning up from 'down there', focused instead on just getting on with it, but the little droplet of white glistening upon her fur gave her an inexplicable pause.
She stood there staring for a second or so, unsure and confused at to what had stopped her, until finally something twigged inside of her.
There was a subtle smell emanating from it, barely registering with her sensitive senses under her own pungent scent of arousal, the various soaps and perfumes of the bathroom and such.
It was 'his' scent, Anon's, but not the heady mix of his sweat and other human smells...
It was something far more... based.
She slowly moved her hand closer to her wide nose, sniffing at the strange but alluring musk.
His scent spoke to the deepest parts of her, the hidden places that had long been abandoned in favor of more maternal feelings and emotions.
It spoke of his need, his strength and youth, his virility...
The senses of an anthro far outstripped that of a typical human in some respects, smell being one of them, and where such a scent might cause a subliminal reaction in a human woman, Jill could almost consciously read it.
Her heart starting to beat faster, she found herself looking around, afraid of being seen by someone despite the absurdity of such a thought in the safety of the bathroom.
Even though her nethers were still throbbing pleasantly from their recent ordeal, a tingling started to sweep through them and upwards towards her stomach as she thought of how much of this musky smelling stickiness he had left inside of her.
Without understanding quite why, she moved her hand closer to her lips... and licked it clean.
Then, the moment passed, and her senses returned.
Realizing that she had spent far too long up in the bathroom as Anon waited downstairs, she hastily finished her clean up, swapped her soaked panties for the second backup pair she had prepared and headed out, pausing only long enough to grab at something from the laundry basket and walking briskly back down towards the living room.
Remembering to swallow and clear her throat, she tried to compose herself.
This was supposed to be a bit of fun after all, it wouldn't do to go getting herself too worked up.
As she approached the living room however, the scent from the bathroom still lingered at the edge of her senses, and 'his' taste still seemed to tease at the tip of her tongue...
-----------------------------------------------------

When you heard her footsteps behind, you turned to greet her.
She was still in her unbuttoned blouse and with her assets now safely locked back away behind the safety of her lace bra.
Her skirt was gone but instead of walking around bottomless she had retrieved her flower patterned sarong and tied it around her waist.
Instead of coming straight to meet you though, she made her way directly over to where she had left her drink and took a large gulp.
While you stood there surprised, she huffed out a sigh of relief and smiled.
Then, nodding back towards the array of pictures behind you, she asked-
"So, see anything you liked over there?"
You return her smile.
"I did actually, and now here it is in front of me."
With a little smirk she turned away, oddly giddy looking all of a sudden, and waved you back over to the sofa.
"Come, sit, I think we've both earned a little rest hmm?"
You happily comply, walking back over and sitting yourself once more on the soft leather seat.
She sat herself next to you, turned to the side with one leg curled under her so she could face you and with her drink still in hand.
In her other hand however she had found a little remote from somewhere, and began tapping buttons at it with her thumb.
After a couple of clicks you heard music start to play, a soft little jazzy number that was really quite pleasant but one that you couldn't name.
"So..." she said smiling, dropping the remote to the side.
"How about we get to know a bit more about each other?"
This, you had not been expecting.
Your face must have betrayed your thoughts, as Jill soon started giggling and waved her hand at you playfully.
"Oh don't worry, this isn't an interrogation or anything.  I just thought it would be... nice, to talk for a bit?"
You couldn't actually see a reason to refuse her, and you didn't get much of a chance to have a proper conversation with someone these days so why not?
"Okay then, what do you want to know?"
She smiled again, happy to be having her curiosity sated.
"Okay... how about you tell me what got you into this line of work?"
You shrug and take a swig of your own drink.
"You mean the whole pool cleaning thing?"
She nodded.
"I just think it's impressive that someone of your age has actually set up his own business actually, as most of the young people around here I know of either leave to go to college or..."
Her eyes darted quickly over to the pictures of Chad and back.
"Well, I'm trying to work up the cash to go to college actually."
She looked surprised at that, so you continue.
"I didn't intend on doing this sort of work when I left school but things didn't really go my way and I didn't have the means to follow my friends and it was the only way I could find to start earning some cash."
She looked confused for a moment before asking her next question.
"What about your family, wasn't there anything they could do to help?"
You shrug once again and polish off your drink.
"Not really."
She looked ready to ask more so you beat her to it.
"I told you before that my parents had retired and gone traveling?  Well that's just part of the story."
As you talked, she scooched in a little closer and refilled your drink, listening intently all the while.
"Truth is that I'm the youngest from a large family, with four older brothers and two older sisters, so it usually worked out that I was end of the line and only really got the hand-me-downs."
"My parents loved us all the best they could and worked hard to put us through school, make every birthday special and all that, but I was the only one they had never planned on having."
"They managed to save and skimp to get my brothers and sisters off to college or wherever they wanted to go but the pot had run dry when it was my turn and they had a choice to make; put off retirement and keep working to send me off to college or finally get that camper van they always wanted and spend their twilight years enjoying life."
You took another swig before finishing your tale.
"Long story short, my brothers and sisters encouraged my parents to retire, said they deserved it, which they did so I agreed."
"They then left, leaving me a small sum to help find somewhere and stand on my own two feet."
You sigh.
"Problem was, there wasn't any work going in town that paid enough for a single guy to live off of, my siblings didn't really want to take the time out of their own lives to come help and I couldn't ask my parents to come back."
"So I started doing odd jobs here and there when the money ran low for some extra cash, and started saving up for college the best I could.  Still got a long way to go but..."
You fall silent.
Jill had listened intently, making sympathetic noises all the while and steadily scooting closer until she had ended up right against you.
"Oh I'm sorry Anon, I didn't mean to bring up something you didn't want to talk about."
You give her your best attempt at a smile.
"Don't worry about it, things are as they are so there's no point me crying over it."
Before she could say more you decide to stop her.
"Okay, my turn?"
She nodded.
"Alright, ask me anything."
You think for a second before asking.
"What do you do?"
She didn't answer so you expanded.
"I mean, do you have a job somewhere or does Chad pay his own way or something?  This is a lovely home you have but it must be expensive to maintain?"
Why this particular question had come out escaped you, perhaps it was just the first thing that came to mind when you scrambled to find something to ask..."
It was Jill's turn to sigh.
"That's a fair question I guess, but the answer is pretty boring."
You waited.
"My late husband, Donald, worked for the printing company 'Print Solutions', the one with a field office in town."
You knew the company, they had turned you down when looking for work, simply saying they "were not hiring at this time."
"He was one of the founding members originally so when he sadly... passed, he left us a number of shares and investments that have paid the bills over the years since."
You could almost feel the eyes of Donald Fearson watching you from the pictures as you reached over and put a hand around Jill's shoulders.
"Damn, sorry Jill I didn't mean to-"
She took the opportunity to lean a little closer into you, now resting with her head upon your chest and both legs on the sofa facing the other way.
"Don't worry, like I said before it's old news."
She soon continued.
"It meant I could focus my time on looking after Chad, but it also meant that I didn't need to go out to work and I ended up just being a full time single mother more than anything else."
"Now that he's gotten older it means that there's not anything much left for me to do now, and it has been getting rather lonely I admit..."
You notice that her glass, her second one, had quickly emptied, and her head slipped down towards your lap.
It looked like she was going to end up falling asleep on you at this rate, not that you would mind too much.
The thought of just sitting here together with her for a time, cradling her head in your lap as she slept, was somehow quite tempting.
There was something about just being around this woman that felt peaceful, in a way you had never really known.
The air of peace and comfort came to a shuddering halt however, throwing you completely off balance once again.
From your lap came the noise of sniffing and snuffling, and you felt a strange pressure pressing down over your crotch.
"Jill?" you ask uncertainly.
"Mmmmmmmmm..." and an odd chuffing noise was her only reply.
Oh my...
--------------------------------------

Chapter 8 - Making Some Headway 

It took you a moment to realize what Jill was doing.
At first you thought that she was starting to doze off, with her muzzle pressing against your crotch and just making some kinda cute snorting noises against the fabric of your pants.
She was very much awake however.
The way she had reached up to fiddle with your only recently re-fastened belt buckle sort of gave it away.
"You ready for another round already?" you ask somewhat incredulously.
She didn't answer, instead choosing to start nibbling on your zipper.
"Well alright then."
Feigning a sigh of untold hardship, you reached down to give her a hand.
Only for her to playfully nip at your fingers, causing you to pull them away quickly.
"Ow, hey!" you grumble in surprise.
She turned her head on your lap to look up at you, a newly mischievous look in those big green eyes.
"Oh no you don't mister, not this time." she purred.
"Twice now you've done things your way, I enjoyed it but I think its my turn now to play..."
There was something in her eyes again, similar to what you saw yesterday in the pool after you had teased her to her breaking point.
Today however, she was very much in control of herself.
Sitting back, you raise your hands in surrender and smile.
"Well then, guess I'm all yours."
She grinned, causing your heart to skip a beat seeing her fangs so close to your crown jewels.
"Good boy." she whispered, and winked.
You sat back and waited, watching as she carefully pulled your belt apart and unfastened your pants.
Despite having only recently had your way with this lusty cougar, her deft touch and her rapt attention had already caused your manhood to start returning to life.
She didn't wait for your member to start tenting your shorts, instead she hooked the waistband with a dark claw and tore them open in a single jerking motion.
"Hey those were my good pair!" you started to grumble.
You quickly fell silent however, seeing your still building cock bare centimeters from the set of claws that had just torn apart your undergarments like so much tissue paper.
She had her eyes firmly fixed on her target, so when she spoke she did so without looking at you.
"There it is..."
She made no further movements, simply sitting there, watching your cock harden.
"Jill?" you ask quietly.
"What are you going to do?"
Again, without looking, she answered.
"Don't worry dear, I just want a little taste, that's all."
Those brilliant gleaming fangs flashed through your mind.
Before you could form another question or complaint however, she moved.
Thankfully retracting those wicked claws, she gently wrapped her padded hand around your now fully erect shaft, holding it firmly in place and eliciting a small grunt from you.
She moved in closer, stopping what must have been millimeters from the twitching tip and resting much of her weight on your lap.
Then, as you waited holding your breath, she took a deep huffing sniff.
You watched, unsure of how to react as she huffed and snuffled at your meat, her eyes closed and her chest heaving.
Then, she made contact.
She began to rub at you, pressing her nose up against your member and rubbing the patches of fur just above her lip where her whiskers sprouted from back and forth dreamily.
You let out the breath you were holding, robbed of your composure slightly by the mix of sensations.
Soft fur, the wetness of her nose, the sudden roughness of her whiskers and back again.
She spent a few minutes doing this, simply repeating the motion of rubbing and nuzzling against your cock with one side of her nose followed by the other, until finally she pulled away.
She had that half lidded dreamy look on her face again now as she turned to face you, a happy smile across her lips.
Without saying anything however, she turned back to her prize and tightened her grip slightly.
Then, with a huff of hot breath as your only warning, she opened her mouth and took her taste.
In a long, single motion, she began to run her long pink tongue up from your still restrained shaft, right up to the quivering head.
You shivered as the sensation run through you, of the hot, wet, soft and roughness of her tongue licked at you like an inappropriately shaped popsicle. 
In the small part of your brain that hadn't yet downed tools to enjoy the show, you wondered how exactly she hadn't felt like so much sandpaper pulling at your sensitive skin?
It didn't matter today, but you would learn much later (as well as a number of other titillating facts about Jill's intimate anatomy) that as the bigger anthro felines evolved to use the power of human speech and as their overall diet diversified, they started to develop softer surfaces to their tongues
Licking tough meat from animal bones became a thing their ancient ancestors once did.
The likes of take away pizza and tofu took far less effort to eat.
As the thin sheen of her saliva quickly began to evaporate, Jill lay still, smacking her lips as she rolled the taste of you around her mouth.
Her purring intensified for a moment, signalling that she liked what she had tasted, before she went in for a second helping.
You watched as she again started from the bottom and worked her way up, lapping at the still as of yet untouched sides of your manhood, until finally she had sampled it all.
You found yourself oddly breathless, the feeling of her purposeful licking and hot breath granting sensations that you had never felt before.
She looked up at you once more, wiping a small droplet of saliva from her lip.
"Having fun yet Anon?" she purred, her smile quite self satisfied.
You try and answer but only manage a small cough from your dry mouth.
You swallow and try again but she interrupted.
"Sounds like you are... but I haven't gotten started yet."
She moved closer to your now thoroughly lubricated manhood once more, and planted a tiny kiss upon the very tip.
"Time for this kitty to get her cream..."
You let out a gasping groan, as she took you into her mouth and began to work her way down.
-----------------------------

Up until this point you had believed yourself to be reasonably 'experienced'.
With a couple of prior sexual exploits below your belt you had walked into this milf's living room confident that you were the instigator, the one pulling the strings, pressing her buttons.
Yet you had never actually been given head before.
So as she steadily worked her way down your shaft, pressing the head of your dick ever closer towards the back of her throat, you did your very best to not just lose your shit.
Your fingers sunk into the supple leather of the sofa, attempting to grab hold of some leverage as her mouth worked it's magic on you.
Even as the warmth of her maw tantalized your flesh, her tongue seemed to caress the sensitive under side of your cock, rubbing against your skin with its rough lining as she worked you ever deeper.
Until you actually reached her throat.
Then she gagged.
Just like that, the warmth was gone, as she pulled herself off of you, coughing and sputtering.
The moment seemingly lost, you quickly move your hands to her cheeks and hold her steady, stroking at her fluff and uttering soothing words until it subsided.
"Shit Jill, are you okay!?!"
At your concerned words she looked up at you, her eyes watering and her gaze awash with embarrassment.
"I-Im fine..." she muttered through coughs, and slipped from the sofa to sit upon the floor.
You both sat in silence as she recovered, her hacking cough slowly fading away.
Finally, you decide to break the silence.
"Listen, Jill... if this is going too fast for you then we can stop..."
Her reaction was quick and without hesitation.
"Don't you dare say that!" she hissed.
"Don't you treat me like some school girl on her first fucking date!"
Her tone was almost bitter, leaving you speechless.
Luckily, she was all to eager to fill the silence.
"Do you know what these last few days have meant to me? Hmm!?!  To actually cut loose and have some fun for once?  To feel like a woman and not just an old mom?"
She didn't wait for a response, continuing on with an increasingly angry rant.
"When I met Donald he promised me everything, told me that I WAS his everything, that he wanted us to be together always..."
"Our first time together?  In the back of his damn car, quick and nasty!"
She refused to look at you in all of this, instead focusing on the pictures across the room.
"Then, when I got pregnant with Chad, that was that!  He proposed, we married, I became a mom and he just ran off to his job."
"Jill, I-"
She ignored you.
"He never touched me again, and I gave up everything to be the perfect housewife and mother... until he died and left us.  Left me..."
She turned back to face you, angry tears starting to mix with her already wet eyes.
"I just settled for life as a widow, raised my son and forgot about what I wanted!"
She was shaking now, but it subsided, her gaze falling downward and her voice weakening.
"Then you come along and make me feel... wanted, again.  Like a woman, desirable!"
She sighed, a sad little huff of air across your still twitching manhood.
"So please, don't go telling me to stop or calm down...  I have needs too, and if I want to suck your goddamn cock then fuck it!  I'm gonna!"
This whole thing had turned on its head, the needy cougar now sitting at your feet not only wanting to give you head but apparently trying to talk you into letting her do it.
You didn't need convincing, silly cougar...
Huffing out a sigh of your own, you smile and gently hold her furry chin in your hand.
"Jill, you don't need to explain yourself to me, alright?"
As she brought her eyes back up to meet yours, you continue.
"This isn't some silly conquest, or a 'first date' as you called it.  We are both here because we want go be."
You brought yourself down to meet her, planting a kiss upon her wide nose.
"If you have a need to get some of my 'cream', then go for it.  Just make sure to come up for air when you need to yeah?  And I'll make sure to tell you when it's time so you can pull off."
Her naughty little smile came back at your words, matched by her glowing eyes, but with a hint of something else you had not seen before.
Something you couldn't yet identify...
So from her new position on the floor, she got to her knees and once more set her sights on your somehow irresistible manhood.

It was slow going at first, with Jill trying to take as much of your length into her mouth as she could but struggling with her gag reflex.
Whenever you got too deep she would have to pull back again quickly to avoid another coughing fit.
The process wasn't all that unpleasant for you of course, not between the continuous caressing from her tongue and the motion of your flesh across the warm interior of her mouth, but it wasn't all easy sailing.
More than once you caught painfully on one of her fangs.
Yet she didn't give up.
Until finally you remembered something from a porno you had seen time ago, a hot number between a human guy and an anthro bird of all things, who had trouble due to her beak.
Something that might help her swallow it down.
Carefully, you stop her movement, holding the furry cheeks of her face in your hands.
"Wait, I've got an idea."
She waited, watching you curiously with your dick still firmly in her mouth.
"Try breathing through your nose for a moment, and then keep doing it while I press deeper."
She complied, and within a minute  she had swallowed your pulsing cock down to the hilt.
You moved your hands up behind her ears as she then started to work you in and out of her throat, helping the movement and steadily building up the rhythm.
She sucked and worked at you with her tongue, making it increasingly difficult to concentrate on anything but rubbing at her ears with your shaking fingers.
She kept at it, sucking and slurping away at you like a woman possessed, until finally you could feel your body giving in.
As her nose pressed in at your groin and retreated again, you moans grew in intensity.
You released her head, just about remembering your promise.
"Shit... Jill, I'm gonna..."
She heard you, pulling back and freeing your manhood from her slick throat with a small cough and a gasp.
You expected her to finish you off with one of her velvety padded hands, but to your surprise...
She took the head of your cock back into her mouth and started to suck and lick at it in earnest.
As your balls twitched and the dam prepared to break, you could but hold onto her once more and squeeze those fluffy ears of hers.
Until you came, rope after pulsing rope of cum, directly into her waiting maw.
She moaned and cood as you coated her mouth, but she didn't spit.
Instead she swallowed it, every drop that she could, sucking it down as if it was her favourite smoothie from a straw.
When you were done however, when finally you pulled yourself free from her reluctantly releasing lips, she greeted you with a smile like a ray of sunshine.
With a girlish giggle, she spoke.
"I finally got my cream..." she whispered, licking her lips and catching the last few drops that had tried to escape her.
"W-was it worth the wait?" you mutter unsteadily, feeling almost like she had sucked the very life from your bones with those glorious lips.
She returned to her place next to you up on the sofa and nestled her muzzle into your neck.
"Very much yes..." she mumbled happily.
"I feel like I'm a kid again, getting her first taste of ice cream..."
Huffing a sigh of exhaustion, you rest your head upon hers, enjoying the feel of her fur against your skin.
"Glad to be of service..." you mutter, feeling absurdly tired.
So it was that you fell asleep upon the sofa in each others arms, despite the sun still shining bleakly through the windows and the birds still chirping away merrily outside the window.
Jill let herself drift into a happy darkness, full of warmth and a musky taste she would never forget, while you found yourself lost in a shifting sea of fur and a rumbling purr.
-----------------------------------------
Chapter 9 - An End, for All Things

When you awoke, it took a moment for you to get your bearings.
Your surroundings were shrouded in darkness, with only the faint glow of a television's standby light offering any kind of reference to your location.
You felt a warm weight on your shoulder and arm, someone resting against you, the sound of their steady breathing the only thing breaking through the silence.
It was Jill, of course.
You were still in her living room, with her still snoozing up against you on the sofa.
It must now be night time, the two of you having slept the rest of the evening away after so vigorously enjoying each other's company.
You considered simply drifting back to sleep, contented with the prospect of waking up again here with her in the morning, but it wasn't to be.
For one thing, your prolonged time spent here in a sitting position with her weight upon you had started an ache in your lower back.
You needed to at least move yourself around a little, or preferably even get up and stretch, but staying put wasn't really going to be an option.
With as much care as you could manage, you tried to extract yourself from the embrace of the sleeping cougar, not wanting to wake her and disturb her peaceful slumber.
The second you began to slip your arm out from under her however, she awoke with a little snort and sat almost bolt upright.
"Ugh... what?  I'm up..." she mumbled groggily, yawning heavily.
Sighing and cursing your lack of finesse, you stand up and stretch, relieving yourself of the stiffness that had been plaguing your back.
"Sorry, didn't mean to wake you."
She looked around and spread her own arms out as she gave a stretch of her own.
"What time is it? she asked sleepily.
"Dunno." you mumbled.
"It's late though."
With your back now recovered, you sat yourself back down on the sofa, considering what position might be better to pull your furry companion back into for a decent night sleep.
Jill had chosen that moment to stand up herself however and had walked slowly over to the door.
She stopped at the threshold and turned back to face you, her feline eyes glowing slightly in the dark.
"I'm not going to be able to get comfortable on that sofa again tonight so I'm going to bed."
Your brain was still only working at around half power by this point, so you just stared at her sleepily for a moment before responding.
"It's kicking out time already?" you mumble, missing the look on her face completely in the darkness.
"No, you silly..." 
Her response faltered as she tried to process your question, and gave up with a sigh.
"Just follow me."
She padded back towards you and reached down, taking hold of your hand and pulling you up from the sofa.
After a full day of heavy manual labour in the garden, followed by a couple of intense sessions with a particularly needy cougar, you were exhausted, in both mind and body.
So as she let you up the stairs it still didn't quite register what was going on until you came to a closed door.
With her free hand she pushed it open, and flicked a switch on the wall inside.
She had led you up to her bedroom.
You only caught a glimpse of her large bed and the surrounding furnishings before it once more disappeared into darkness, as Jill flicked the bright light off again with a hiss.
"Gah!  Too bright!" she grumbled, and led you over to the bed.
After releasing your hand she climbed up on the bed and made her way over and under the covers, leaving you standing there in the dark by the side, blinking and attempting to recover your night vision.
"Come on, I won't bite... much." she snickered from the darkness.
You drop your pants, but keep your shorts, and climb in after her.
The bed was soft, softer than the small bundle of bedding in your trailer, and far more comfortable feeling than any bed you had found yourself in before.
The sheets were silky soft, the pillows fluffy and giving.
The best part though, was that it all smelled of her.
As you settled in to the soft, sweet smelling embrace of the sheets, you turned to Jill, expecting that she had brought you up here to her bed for a late round three.
As your eyes finally adjusted to the dark however, you saw that she had already fallen back asleep.
She lay there facing you, her eyes closed and her mouth slightly open.
She was once more breathing deeply and serenely, the steady rhythm of a deep sleeper.
You were actually kind of glad, you weren't sure you had a round three actually in you at this point so it was a relief to instead let yourself drift back off again.
First however, you moved yourself over closer to her, gently pulled her in to your embrace, and finally gave in to your exhaustion.
She gave a little sigh as you moved her, but then settled in against you like it was where she had always been.
As the darkness overtook you, a contented smile made it's way to your lips, and stayed there.
----------------------------------------------------

The next morning came for you much like the taxman; far too soon.
Your first waking breath, taken in through the nose, filled your senses with the scent of Jill.
As you opened your eyes, your first vision of the day was of her smiling face.
She was awake too, laying there beside you and waiting.
"Morning Anon." she whispered lightly, her smile growing.
"Morning Jill." you say back, returning her smile.
You both continued to lay there like that for a while, happy to bask in one another's company while the world went by unnoticed.
It was Jill who eventually broke the silence.
"It's been a long time since I've woken up next to a man in bed like this you know." she whispered playfully.
"It's... nice."
You reach over with your free hand, the other still pinned somewhere beneath her, and stroke her ruffled cheek.
"Just nice?" you ask, feigning hurt.
"I think we can probably find a way to upgrade that to something better, you think?"
She let out a little giggle as she pressed her cheek further into your hand.
"Oh?  What do you have in mind?"
In response, you slowly move your hand downwards along her body.
From her cheek you make your way along her neck, feeling her shiver ever so slightly in response, down along her shoulder and arm, down towards the hidden form of her hip, and stopping when you find the line of her panties.
As she stared into your eyes, biting her lip in response to your touch, you lean in closer to her and kiss the tip of her wide nose.
In return she stopped biting said lip and instead brought her mouth up to yours, kissing you deeply and pressing her tongue in to meet your own.
Even as you slid your fingers beneath the line of her panties and began rubbing the fur beneath, she lifted herself up from her place next to you.
Breaking the kiss, she rose up and sat herself on your stomach, still wearing her now creased and battered blouse loosely, her bountiful breasts still restrained with lace and held above you.
She giggled again, seemingly intoxicated by your attentions and happy to return them.
She pulled her shoulders back and slipped the blouse off completely, leaving only the red lacy bra.
Not missing a beat, you untangle your hands from her panties and sheets, and pull her back down towards you.
Her breasts press into your chest as you kiss her once more, and as your hands work their way around to her back and start fiddling with the little clasp there.
It takes a couple of tries, but you soon feel it pop free.
She gasped, an odd sensation with her tongue busy tangling with your own at the time, but it gave you the chance to break the kiss and push her back up again.
Needing no direction, she pulled the now loose straps from her arms and tossed the bra aside, allowing you to bask in the glory that was her now free bosom.
She lowered herself down again, bringing her breasts right up to your face.
"See anything you like?" she asked with a grin.
Matching her with a smile of your own, you bring your hands to bare once more, cupping a tit in each one and squeezing them softly together.
As she let out another little gasp, you leaned your head upwards, bringing your face into her waiting bosom, and pressed your lips into her fine fur.
She used her hands to brace against the headboard, keeping herself in position while you tended to her
As you felt the fur rub across your face, you worked your way towards her dark nipples.
They weren't hard to find, the now hardened flesh easily distinguishing themselves from the softer fluff.
Bringing your lips to the closest, you gently began to kiss at the furless areas just around the erect nub, hearing her gasps turn to little rumbling groans.
Her flesh was, like her lips, oddly sweet, or so you thought as you brought your tongue to bare and circled the hardened nipple in earnest.
She shook as you began kissing, licking, and softly sucking at her sensitive breast, and swapping over to the other as soon as she began to finally moan in earnest.
You felt the heat upon your stomach rise, followed shortly by a pleasing dampness from her panties.
It was when you got a bit too carried away and gave her heaving breast a little nip, that she pulled up away from you.
She was panting slightly, her green eyes once more ablaze, and she looked like she was ready for more.
"A-alright..." she panted.
"I'm ready.  G-give it to me!"
Panting yourself now, you reach back down towards her hips, and watch as she rose up off your stomach to accommodate.
She wriggled her hips as you pulled her panties downward, peeling them from her moist womanhood, and then stood up over you on the bed to allow them to fall freely the rest of the way.
As you gazed upwards appreciativly at her now fully naked and standing form, she looked downward, specifically at your now erect and waiting dick with a hungry grin.
She kicked away the panties and dropped down to her knees, her hot snatch hovering over your waiting dick.
Then with careful precision, she lowered herself down onto you, sliding your manhood slowly but surely inside of herself.
She moaned, that slutty little moan she had made in the pool previously as she sunk all the way down.
When finally she was sitting upon you completely once more, your throbbing cock snugly tucked away inside, she placed her padded hands on your chest and stared into your eyes.
"Now fuck me." she purred.
You returned her smile and moved to pull her down to your side.
She didn't budge.
"No." she almost growled.
"I said fuck me.  Here.  Like this."
She pushed down on your chest as she rose her hips upwards, her snatch clinging to you as it pulled up and away, before coming roughly back downwards again.
The swift movement damn near winded you, but she remained still, waiting for you go respond.
"Fuck me!" she demanded.
"Fuck me like you love me!"
You didn't need telling again.
Grabbing hold of her hips, you buck your own upwards roughly, forcing yourself somehow deeper inside of her and sending her bouncing upwards.
She let loose another deep moan, obviously pleased with your effort, before pushing off to come down on you again once more.
As she worked herself into a rhythm, you followed suit.
As she came down, you pushed upwards, ensuring you came together with a wet slap as you roughly went to town on one another.
Her breasts bounced and jiggled just above your face, tantalizingly out of reach, but getting a hold of them once again was somehow not on your priority list right now.
You both gave in to a kind of animalistic passion, causing the bed to creak, bang and groan in time with you as your bodies met.
You felt pain bloom where her clawed fingers dug into your chest, but the sensation only seemed to intensify the waves of pleasure that came crashing after each thrust.
"Ngh... G-god oh god...!" she moaned, repeating it again and again as you hit harder and deeper.
Under this sort of pressure, neither of you lasted long.
You came deep inside of her with barely any warning, your already battered balls pumping out all they could in response to the unrelenting assault of pleasure, while she screamed her wail of the damned shortly afterwards, collapsing down atop you once more as it subsided.
You wrapped your arms up around her and held her close as your manhood twitched and throbbed inside of her, waiting for it to finally run dry and soften before allowing yourself to speak.
"Damn Jill..." you whisper.
She pulled herself back upwards out of your embrace, sitting atop you still and looking down.
She was still breathing heavily, eyes unfocused, but looking quite pleased with herself again.
"Wow... you really know how to show a lady a good time don't you..."
As she leant back down to kiss you however, a loud bang froze you both.
"M-mom!?!"
Neither of you dared even breathe.
Jill slowly turned her head to look over her shoulder, while you peeked around the side of her still quivering hip.
Standing there in the doorway was Chad, his bag laying on the floor where he'd just dropped it.
His face displaying a mix of horror, shock, and disgust, as he beheld the scene before him.
Well fuck....
-----------------------------------------------

Chapter 10 - Alone Again

For a long moment, nothing and no one moved, spoke, or even breathed.
Chad simply stood there, staring with his mouth wide with horrified disbelief.
While Jill sat dead still on top of you, her back still turned to her son and perhaps afraid to move in case she accidentally showed him something that would scar him further.
You meanwhile simply lay there on the bed, staring up at the ceiling and wondering which of your own warring emotions would come out first.
On one hand, part of you wanted to look the normally smug little shit in the eye and laugh.
To slap his mother's ass before him and say "Oh hey Chad!  Who's the baddest mother fucker around now huh?" and then laugh as he ran screeching from the room.
It would almost make those years of hell he'd put you through back in high school worth it.
On the other hand though...
You could already see Jill's world start to fall apart under the accusing eyes of her only son.
She had given up everything to raise the ungrateful man-child by herself so to have him hate her now would be unbearable.
It wouldn't matter that she deserved happiness in her life too, Chad wouldn't accept her doing something like this, and certainly not with you of all people.
You didn't want to hurt Jill, despite your desire to see Chad break down it had somehow become much more important to you that she didn't suffer as a result.
Carefully, you took hold of the topmost bed sheet and held it up to the still frozen cougar.
She turned her face back to face you, her eyes wide and unseeing but taking the sheet all the same.
As she pulled it around to cover herself up however, the movement had snapped Chad from his own shock and spurred him to move himself.
He quickly turned and began to almost run down the hall, leaving his fallen bag and a string of "Fuck fuck fucks!" behind him.
Jill did her best to follow him, pulling herself from her place on top of you and darting after him wearing nothing but the large bed sheet.
"Chad?  Honey, please let me explain!" 
Her words were met by the slamming of what must have been his bedroom door.
Then silence.
You pulled yourself out of bed, the pleasant aching around your crotch suddenly no longer welcome as you set about finding your hastily discarded shorts and pants.
It was as you were pulling on your shoes that Jill returned, her eyes now puffy with tears and her shoulders slumped.
You rose to meet her and tried pulling her in towards you for a hug.
"Listen, Jill I'm sorry that he found out like that-"
She resisted however and pulled away.
Her voice was wavering as she spoke and she couldn't seem to bring herself to look at you.
"I think you should leave now."
You found your own voice choking inside your throat.
The words you wanted to say unable to come out.
You stare at her for a second, waiting to see if she had anything else to say.
When nothing came though, you wordlessly left and showed yourself out.

The sun was once more devilishly hot outside and beat down upon your bare shoulders as you plodded down into the garden once more in search of your shirt.
You had not stopped to retrieve it yesterday, what with Jill coming over to lure you inside.
It was where you had left it, down on the grass next to a bag of bush clippings.
As you bent to pick it up, you looked around the garden once more with a sigh.
You had finished all of the work that Jill had contracted you for so there would be no reason to come back here again.
There was still the matter of yesterday's pay cheque that Chad had stolen you were still owed, but now didn't seem like the time to be broaching the subject.
You turned to face the house, hoping perhaps for a final glimpse of Jill through the windows before you left.
Instead you saw Chad's glaring face staring at you.
Of course, Jill's room faced the front of the house.
You were tempted to give him a little wave, a final parting shot before hopefully never seeing him again, but chose not to.
The sinking feeling in your chest that had come with your parting from Jill had refused to budge, dampening your spirits to a troubling extent and robbing you of even the slightest sliver of mischief.
Losing her was hurting more than any possible satisfaction you could get from Chad.
Before you left however, you couldn't help but notice the look on his face.
Gone was the childish disdain from your school days now.
He looked upon you with what could only be hate.
Leaving the Fearson property for good, you felt his gaze follow you until you were finally out of sight.
----------------------------------

The following days were... difficult.
You had expected to feel bummed out by the parting, with losing access to a hot milf cougar who would most likely fuel your personal fantasies for years to come.
What you hadn't expected however was the little things.
You awoke in the middle of the first night with the sound of her laughter ringing in your ears.
You found yourself stopping dead while walking down the street, for a split second swearing that the scent of her perfume had wafted by, but finding no trace of it or her around you.
You missed the way she looked at you, the way she made you feel.
In the days that followed you even found yourself pulling up her number on your phone, still saved from when she had first called to hire you for the gardening gig.
You started typing out messages, deleting and re-typing, asking how she was doing or about your pay.
Nothing was ever sent though as you could never seem to bring yourself to hit the send key.
That little voice of doubt had recovered enough to stop you, pointing out the best you could expect would be silence in response.
Or perhaps even something cold, saying never to contact her again.
So you settled for nothing at all.
At least you still had that bottle of whiskey to keep you company.

About a week later however, things took a turn for the worse.
After a couple of days brooding, you had pulled yourself together and set about getting on with work.
Your savings account wasn't going to fill itself up and a bit of manual labour should have helped get your mind off of things nicely.
Except there was no work to be found.
At this time of year you could expect at least a couple of calls a week in response to your adverts, from some older person looking for help with the garden or a well off type who didn't have time to clean his own pool, but the phone was silent.
So, you had gone out and walked around town to drum up some business.
You had managed to get a cheap deal on some basic business cards time ago, a couple of small boxes worth with your name and number on advertising your services.
Stopping at the various stores and noticeboards you pinned up a fresh card and even dropped a few off in the mailboxes of houses where the gardens looked particularly neglected.
Yet still... nothing.
In your time doing this work you had picked up a couple of regulars, those who had liked your work so much that they asked you to come back again.
Even these had fallen silent.
So, in desperation, you went to visit one of your most loyal to see if he at least needed his lawn trimmed.
The old mole man that had given you the whiskey in the first place.

So it was that you found yourself knocking on his door, noting with relief that his garden was already looking a bit unkempt and feeling that your spell of unemployment might be short lived after all.
When he answered however, it wasn't with his usual smile.
He stood at around four foot, hunched over slightly with a walking stick, and wearing a thick set of dark lensed glasses.
His once jet black body hair was now tinged with a sheen of white and grey, giving him an almost silver look.
He peered up at you suspiciously, before finally grunting out a greeting.
"Oh, it's you."
Okay, not the welcome you had expected...
"Well, what do ya want?" he snapped, cutting you off before you could even start.
A little taken aback, you push on.
"Hi Mr Peters, long time no see!" you say with your usual smile.
He simply grimaced.
Unperturbed, you continue.
"It's been a little while since your last cut and since I was in the area anyway I was wondering... did you need anything done today?"
He squinted at you a little from behind his glasses before wrinkling his long nose and answering.
"Ya have some cheek I'll give ya that boy."
You blink, not sure how to respond.
"I don't think I need ya working around here anymore, so it's best if ya just take me of yur books and leave."
Stunned, you take a step back.
"What... why?" you ask, confused.
He eyed you up again before sighing and shaking his head.
"Word has it that you've been up to no good, there's stories going 'round that ya been helping yourself to people's kitchens instead of working..."
You stand there in disbelief, jaw open and speechless.
He continued.
"There's been some stories too that ya been trying to take advantage of some old widow too, that you got caught with ya pants down after getting her drunk!"
Your jaw managed to flap uselessly a few times before the words would come.
"That's just... that's bullshit!"
He recoiled from your outburst, retreating now behind his partially closed door.
Taking another step back you raise your hands up apologetically and take a deep breath.
"I'm sorry sir, that was rude of me, I didn't mean to-"
The mole snorted.
"Bah, it don't matter what excuses ya got!  It's all online for everyone to see now!"
"What?"
You were stumped.
Lacking the money to have an internet connection on your phone you just used it for calls and texts, leaving the luxury of social media to those who could afford it.
He continued.
"It's all there!  The whole sorry story by the one who found out about it warning everyone about what ya been up to!"
Shaking now but trying not to show it and scare off the old mole, you do your best to calmly continue.
"That's just not true, I have not been thieving or taking advantage of anyone."
Deep breaths, deeeeeeep breaths...
"Who exactly am I supposed to have been... doing whatever I'm supposed to have done to then huh?  Does it say?"
He shook his head.
"Not that I'd tell ya anyway, but it don't mention no names.  Just says that the widow was too embarrassed to go to the authorities and 'a concerned citizen' just wanted to warn anyone thinking of hiring ya."
You had clenched your fist tightly as he spoke, so tight that your nails very nearly broke the skin of your palm.
"That's... that's just slander damn it!  I haven't done anything!"
He shook his head again sadly.
"Ya think ya got the measure of a person..."
Then he was gone, the door shut and deadbolt drawn pointedly.
You stood there for a while, shaking and trying to process the old mole's words.
There was only one person that could be doing it of course.
Only one person that would deliberately go out of their way to attack you with such specific lies.
It was that fucker Chad, it had to be!
Your mind full of all the different ways you could make him pay, you stomped out and away from the mole man's home, unaware that he was already on the phone to his neighbours gossiping all about your 'terrifying visit'.
---------------------------------------------

For the next few hours you sat in the local park, or on a crumbling bench by a piece of patchy grass that passed for one anyway.
The old mole's words spun through your mind, round and around as you tried to make sense of it.
Had it actually been Chad?
Did Jill know he was doing it?
Was she... okay with him doing it?
No she couldn't be...
If it was him then what could you do about it?
After shaming him in the garden that first day there was little doubt you could kick his chubby rear over a goalpost or two in deserved retribution, but what then?
He reports you for assault?
Possibly worth it but...
The look in Jill's eyes once she realized that you had beaten her only son half to death, even if he deserved it...
Oddly, that seemed less bearable than getting busted by the cops.
Then could you report him instead?
Surely, naming you publicly online like that and claiming you were some sort of home invading wannabe rapist couldn't be legal?
The prospect of having him locked away was indeed tempting... although he would probably just get away with a slap on the wrist anyway like he always does.
Plus it would require Jill siding with you against her own son, admitting to the cops she had a willing fling with you and actively contradicting Chad.
Somehow you couldn't see her doing it.
The more you pondered it the less you liked it.
How well did you even know her anyway or her you?
She didn't owe you anything and wouldn't turn on family for you certainly...
With a heavy sigh you decide to go back home.
It was still pretty early in the afternoon but there wasn't much chance of solving this right now, might as well get out of the sun at least and then see if a night's sleep would help clear up your thoughts for tomorrow.
-------------------------------------

When you arrived home however, you realized there wasn't going to be a quiet moment of contemplation waiting for you.
It seemed someone had been busy.
The flimsy door of your trailer had been kicked in, and it's solitary window of murky plastic had been smashed.
On top of that, what little you owned had been scattered over the dead grass like so much garbage.
Your meager collection of clothes stomped into the dirt and keepsakes smashed.
The trailer itself had been hit by spray paint too, with words such as 'THIEF', 'PERV', and a poorly spelt 'LOOSER' marking the front in still dripping fury.
Stepping slowly through the ruins, you enter the trailer to see that the interior hadn't been spared either.
What few fittings it had once offered lay smashed, while the food you had squirrelled away carefully using your small shopping budget was missing or in pieces on the floor.
Slowly, you step back out and sit yourself on the step, oddly calm.
You wanted to scream, to start finding things not yet broken and start breaking them yourself.
You needed to break Chad's face.
Urgently.
First however, you needed to speak with Jill.
To ask her point blank if she knew what her son had been up to.
To ask her why she would let him.
To just hear her try and explain it.
Pulling out your phone, you punch in the number.
It only took a couple of rings before connecting.
"Hello?  Mrs Fearson's phone?"
It was not Jill.
It was Chad.
"You!"
It was all you could say, barely managing to spit the word from your mouth.
"Oh hi there Anon!  How you been?" he smirked.
"Was this you!?!"
Suddenly you were standing, your voice rising and your temper finally ready to let rip.
"What are you talking about?" he asked innocently, voice dripping with sarcasm.
"You know exactly what!" you spat.
"The shit about me online, my fucking trailer, all of it!"
He let out a little chuckle of satisfaction before responding.
"I have no idea what you mean..."
"Really?  Then if I came down there and paid you a visit I wouldn't find your chubby little hands covered with paint would I?"
His only response was yet more gleeful laughter.
Finally no longer able to contain yourself, you snap.
"Alright you fat fuck!  Get ready cos I'm coming down there to teach you some-"
His laughter stopped, but he instead cut you off with some words of his own.
"I don't think so Anon."
You stop, despite the need to rage.
"You can't touch me, not one stupid hairless finger."
"The hell do you-"
He carried on talking over you though.
"I already got shit on you Anon, you already know what got put down online.  All I gotta do is call the cops, tell them that you tried it on with my mom when she was too drunk to know better, and they kick your stupid ass in jail."
You pause, giving him all the confirmation he needed to go for the kill.
"I know you've been all over my house, there are... signs."
He sounded uncomfortable then, but quickly continued.
"I've watched enough cop shows to know that's more than enough for reasonable doubt!"
His words left you reeling.
"What are on you idiot!  She was very much in on what we were-"
He interrupted yet again.
"No!  My mom wouldn't touch a dirty human like you!  It was you taking advantage because your sick!" he screamed.
You started to yell back but he wasn't listening anymore.
"You fucked with my mom, so I'm fucking with your life!  When I'm done telling everyone what a freak you are, there won't be a single place left in town that will give you a job, not even to scrub the crapper!"
You could but listen to him rant, any attempt at responding falling on deaf ears.
"Oh, and that dumpster you call home?  Do you wanna know something funny?"
He didn't wait for an answer.
"Turns out one of my guys' dad owns that piece of crap, and I don't think he's going to happy to carry on renting it out to someone like you anymore!"
You could feel the ground seemingly opening up under your feet, your already quite sad little world crumbling away.
"You nasty little-" you mutter, the strength leaving your voice now.
"Now you see?" he snickered nastily.
"You are done.  The only reason I haven't just had you arrested is because my stupid mom said she won't tell them anything."
You perked up a touch.
"But we both now that if you come down here to make trouble then I'll have to tell them everything, then she'll have no choice but to either agree with me, her son, or you."
He snickered once more.
"We both now she wouldn't side with you if you came down here and messed with me, the hired fucking help over her own blood?"
You couldn't think of anything to say, of any way to counter.
He sighed happily.
"That's right, I win, now fuck off and die freak."
With that he hung up, leaving you standing alone among the ruins of your life.
It was like you were back in school again, at Chad's mercy as he smiled and played the surrounding teachers and anyone that could have helped you.
As he merrily hurt you in the places he knew no one could see.
He had won.
------------------------

Chapter 11 - Indecent Proposals 

You weren't sure how long you spent sitting amongst the ruins before you moved again, an hour or so at the least.
With just a few actions Chad had ruined you, your reputation, your only source of income, and made you essentially homeless too.
It was the final thought that had spurred you into moving, as you couldn't just take his word on your landlord but needed to know for sure.
So you called him, hoping that if you reported the vandalism and damage he might at least agree to come fix the door or something and make it secure.
Sadly however, Chad had been true to his word.
Instead of a repair schedule, he gave you a couple of days to settle the remaining rent and leave.
He planned on selling the remains of the trailer for scrap, not fixing it.
Had it been anywhere else you might have had rights, a tenancy agreement that you could fall back on.
Your stay here however wasn't completely above board, it was cheap, had allowed you to move in straight away, but gave you no protection from the guy just booting you out.
So, with that settled at least, you set about patching up the broken door and window with what broken materials you had at hand and got cleaning.
You collected your soiled clothes, swept the broken crap out of the trailer interior and at least made it bearable to spend a final night in.
With the door and window firmly sealed up to prevent any more visitors, and the day long having become night, you fell into an uncomfortable sleep.
---------------------------------------

The next morning you formed a plan.
There wasn't anything here in this dead end town anymore and you didn't have anywhere near enough money to think about college yet, so it was time to leave.
You would have to use your saved money to buy a coach ticket out of town, perhaps to the nearest city, where you could look for work there and hopefully start again.
It hadn't been your first choice back when you had been left alone here, mainly because you had no idea what you might find out there and had only a cautionary tale from your school days to go by.
One of the few other humans in high school from the year above you had finished much like you would, without any money and with no job prospects in town.
So he had gone off to the city with his guitar to make it big, or at least find a nice burger joint to go work at anyway.
Just before you were due to graduate was when he came back, in a coffin.
Apparently the city hadn't been kind to him, draining what little money he had brought and leaving him living off the streets and busking for petty change.
You never found out how he actually died, only attended his funeral when his dad brought his body back home.
You had vowed not to end up like him then, yet here you were belatedly following in his footsteps.

You spent the morning packing up your dirty clothes and getting yourself ready to go, your heart heavy and your future uncertain.
So when your phone rang, you didn't even check to see who it was and just answered.
"Hello?" you asked, not really even sure why you were bothering.
It might have been someone still willing to employ you maybe, not that it would make a difference now.
"Anon?  It's me."
You froze, the soft voice clearly being Jill's.
"Jill?"
She breathed a sigh of relief, and let loose one of her little chuckles that even now brought a twitch to your lips.
"Oh good, I thought I'd never get through to you!"
You didn't quite know what to say.
What did she want?
"Did you want something Jill?" you ask, your voice flat.
She paused, perhaps sensing your mood.
"Well... I just wanted to meet up with you and sort out your last pay packet, the one Chad... borrowed?"
Damn, you had nearly forgotten about that.
"Fine, I'll swing by the front gate of the house in an hour and you can give it to me there."
You're words were clipped, making it apparent that you had places to be.
"Oh..." she responded, suddenly less sure sounding of herself.
She didn't agree though surprisingly.
"Actually, I don't think you coming over right now would be a good idea so I was hoping that we could meet in town for a coffee maybe?"
You stall while forming your denial, suddenly conflicted.
You needed to be done with this town, with the trouble her family was causing you, with the whole lot of it.
Yet...
The prospect of seeing her again, even just one last time was drawing you in, inexplicably overriding your other thoughts.
"Okay, fine..." you eventually respond.
"When and where?"
"Oh!  Wonderful!" she chirped, sounding genuinely pleased.
With that she gave you the name of a small coffee shop in town and arranged to meet you there in an hour.
When she had gone you pocketed the phone and sighed.
Just going to go pick up the money she owed and then you are leaving.
That's what you kept telling yourself anyway.
Yet as you made your way across town, you couldn't deny the worrying little flicker of excitement in your chest as the time of the meeting drew ever closer...
-------------------------------------

When you got the the coffee shop, a cosy little place run by a couple of squirrels called 'Nuts About Coffee', Jill was already waiting.
She was sat in a little corner booth, wearing a flowing polka dot summer dress that hugged her figure handsomely.
She sat up and waved as soon as she saw you, once more wearing the make up she had used before when she had made an effort to impress you.
Sighing, you walk on over and sit opposite her, tucking your bag of worldly belongings down under the table.
"Hi Anon!" she trilled happily, seemingly oblivious to all that had been happening.
"It feels like forever since I saw you last, and-"
She stopped abruptly as a surly looking squirrel stood by the booth and cleared his throat.
"Can I get you anything?" he asked with feigned enthusiasm.
"Yes, I'll have a latte please and..." 
Jill looked at you expectantly.
"A latte please, two sugars." you grumble.
With a swish of his bushy tail, he left, leaving you alone with Jill once more.
She had realized now that something was wrong from your less than stellar demeanour, a puzzled frown creasing her furry face.
"Are you okay Anon?" she asked tentatively.
"You don't look yourself today."
You tried to work out if she was truly oblivious to what had happened or if maybe she had no idea of how you might be feeling about it all.
When you didn't answer she forced a smile and continued.
"If you're angry about the way I kind of kicked you out the other day then I'm sorry about that, really."
You just stare, not sure if she's being serious or not.
"It's just when Chad came home and saw us like that, it was difficult, and I just needed some time alone with him to try and make sure he was okay, that's all."
She continued.
"We had an argument an we both said some things we regret...  I'm sure he'll come round eventually but at the end of the day it's not up to him who I see or who I don't see."
The way she was talking...
She must have no idea.
"I would have called you sooner but Chad was really acting like a child, he took my phone and deleted your number from it."
She snorted out a laugh.
"Can you believe that?"
"It took me until this morning to find the little card with your number on it to call you, I'm so sorry for keeping you waiting all this time."
She reached out and placed her velvety hand over yours on the table top.
Then, giving your hand a little squeeze, she whispered to you.
"So... do you forgive me?"
She really didn't know.
You place your other hand over hers and add yet another sigh to the impressive collection already assembled.
"Jill, the thing is I-"
You were interrupted by the squirrel returning with the coffee.
"Anything else I can get you folks?" he asked, rolling his eyes.
"No thanks." you reply shortly.
He left you alone once more with a grumble.
"Jill..."
You tried to speak but she beat you to it.
"So I was thinking...  The garden is looking lovely after all the work you put into it but there's a few things inside the house that need doing..."
She was looking at you expectantly, but you instead pull your hands away from hers and look to the side.
"I'm leaving Jill."
She blinked.
"Wait, what?  As in town?"
"Some things have happened since I saw you last and I can't stay here anymore, I've got to go."
When you looked back she was crestfallen, her eyes wide and her mouth slightly open.
"Why?  What's happened?" she asked.
"Is it... because of me?  Did I do something?  What about your business?"
You look into her eyes and see genuine hurt and concern there, so you decide to just tell her.
"Have you looked online recently, at what people in town are talking about?"
She shook her head.
"No... I don't really use that social media stuff so I tend to miss a lot of gossip.  Why?"
"Have a look at your phone, and see what the town is currently talking about."
She looked puzzled, but pulled out her phone and complied.
It took a few minutes of careful tapping before she could access one of the motr popular sites, but you could tell she had seen what you meant.
"Wait... there's all these posts about you Anon..."
She scrolled down until she found the original, the one that a not so anonymous Chad had made.
She brought her hand to her mouth as she read it, her eyes darting back and forth as she took in the words.
"This is terrible Anon!" she whispered.
"Why would someone write something like this?"
You waited.
She kept on reading.
"This was written a few days ago, but it says it happened about a week earlier..."
She looked back up at you.
"That's not right, it says this happened the week that you were working at my house, when you were with me..."
Then it clicked.
"Is this... is this supposed to be about me?"
You waited some more.
"Who would write this?  Why would they..."
You saw the realization in her eyes, the truth come flooding home of its own accord.
"No... he wouldn't..."
You nodded sadly.
"It was."
She dropped her phone to the table and brought both hands to her mouth now.
"I tried calling you yesterday when I heard about it, but Chad answered and he admitted it."
She shook her head.
"No he couldn't..."
"Check your phone, look at the logged calls from yesterday."
She did, and saw the call from your number lasting several minutes.
She sat silently for a while, processing her son's actions.
"With that message up I can't get any work in this town anymore, no one will hire me."
"Then someone broke into my trailer and trashed it yesterday too, now the landlord's evicting me so I've got no choice."
She had covered her eyes now with her hands and still didn't speak.
"I'm going to catch a bus over to the city and see if I can get some work there."
When she finally looked up at you her eyes were puffy, but she wasn't crying.
She looked... scary.
"Anon, I'm sorry."
You blinked, taken aback by the odd tone of her voice.
"It seems I'm going to have to have some words with my son about how to behave."
She reached into her bag and pulled out an envelope.
"Here is the last pay packet that Chad borr-"
She stopped herself.
"I mean stole."
You opened it up, but noticed there was more in there than there should have been.
"Wait Jill, there's too much in here..."
She smiled again, her features softening.
"I wasn't sure if you would come back again after the other day, it was wishful thinking on my part that you might, so I put in some extra."
She brought her hand to yours again.
"Those days we spent together were... wonderful, and I just wanted you to have something, to thank you for it."
You flipped your thumb through the cash inside the envelope, quickly judging there to be a considerable amount therein.
That kind of cash would help you no end in getting set up somewhere else, making life slightly easier for a change.
Yet...
You pulled out what you were owed for the work and handed the rest back.
She looked at it confused.
"Anon?  I don't understand."
You smiled.
"Jill, the time we spent together really was special go me too."
You took her furry hand once more in yours, lifted it up and kissed it softly.
"Remember what I said that day?  When you asked me to stay behind for a special job you had for me?"
She nodded.
"I said I stayed to wait for you, not for a job."
You brought your other hand to her face and gently held her cheek.
"The time we had was wonderful, and I'll never forget it, or you."
With that you got up, took hold of your bag and started walking to the door.
Jill simply sat there, dazed, with her hand held up to where yours had been touching her face moments earlier.
You paid for the coffee at the counter and left.
As you started the long walk down the street towards the bus station however, you heard the door clatter open behind you.
"Anon wait!"
You turned and saw Jill standing there panting.
"Please don't go, not yet!"
You look at her, confused.
"Jill?" you ask uncertainly.
She quickly came marching up to you, her green eyes glowing.
"I want to do something, but I need to go home and sort something else, and someone, first."
"Jill, I told you, I don't really have a choice in the matter, I have to go."
She grabbed your hand.
"Please trust me, promise you won't go anywhere for now, for today?"
"What are you-"
She stopped you with a furry finger to your lips.
"Promise me."
You sigh once more and nod.
She made a little 'cooing' sound of joy, before dropping your hand and turning away.
"Okay, I'll call you later so don't go anywhere!"
She started to almost run off, but quickly turned back and pulled you into a deep kiss.
There was others on the street, gasping and scandalized at the sight of you both, but it suddenly failed to matter.
Wrapping your arms around her, you lift her off the ground and drink deeply of her sweet lips.
Until finally you both pulled away, breathing deeply to try catch your breath.
She gave you a naughty smile and a wink, before once more speeding away, her dress billowing out behind her.
You didn't know what she had planned, but you knew that you wanted to stick around long enough to find out.
So you headed off down into town, smiling like an idiot with Jill's lipstick still smudged across your face.
---------------------------------

It was well into the afternoon when she called you back on your phone.
The buzz from her surprise smooch had worn off and you had busied yourself washing your clothes down at the laundrette.
It was an expense you normally wouldn't pay so suddenly for but with rent now no longer a concern, you needed some clean things at least.
So as you sat there waiting by the dryer your phone rang, and Jill had some things to say.
"Hey Anon it's me!"
She sounded excited, or pumped up on triple strength caffeine, or both.
"Hi Jill, are you okay?"
It was difficult to hear over the dryer and there seemed to be a noise of some sort on her end too.
"I'm great, but what about you?  Are you still in town?  You haven't left or anything have you?"
You chuckled.
"Nope, still in town, just getting my clothes cleaned."
"Okay." she chirped.
"Which place are you at?  I'm going to come pick you up."
"What, really?" you ask.
It must have been the sound of a car's engine you could hear on her end then.
"Of course, now where are you?"

By the time she arrived your clothes were ready, you on the other hand were not.
She pulled up in a bright red Porsche, canvas roof down and beaming at you from behind her sunglasses.
"Alright, pop the bag in the trunk and climb on in!"
You complied.
You felt yourself press into the seat as she accelerated, the engine purring as she sped up through the streets.
"Damn Jill I didn't know you had something like this!" you yell, trying to be heard over the rushing air.
"She smiled at you a little wider.
"I don't really use it much, but today felt like a good day to take her for a spin!"
 Before you knew it, you were parked up outside the gate to her home with the engine idling.
She turned to face you.
"Sorry for the wait, but there were some things that just needed doing and I wanted to check on a little something."
You raise an eyebrow.
"Oh really, like what?"
She killed the engine.
"I had to go deal with my son firstly, to make him take down those lies he'd put up online and find out why he did it in the first place."
She let out a deep breath.
"I didn't like his answer, not one bit, so we've had a falling out."
"Jill, I'm sorry to hear that." you say softly, but not really feeling any sympathy for her wayward son.
"For now I've sent him to stay with his aunt, my sister in law."
She paused.
"There are going to be some changes around here, I know I've coddled him too much over the years so perhaps this has been a wakeup call."
You were happy to hear that he was taking down the posts, but there would be no repairing the damage to your reputation in this town.
"Why are you telling me this Jill?"
She smiled a bit sheepishly at you.
"Well, remember that you saw those magazines here before about travelling?"
You nod.
"After all of this and with what Chad put online I thought that I would just go for it, just book a spur of the moment holiday and get away from here for a little while."
Your heart sank.
"Oh, I see.  So where are you going?"
She looked out into the distance dreamily.
"I've booked a cruise, one that goes out across the sea and back again over a few weeks."
You nod.
"Sounds nice, but if you're going away, why did you ask me to stay?"
She reached over and placed a hand on your knee.
"Because I want you to come with me silly."
Your jaw dropped.
"Huh?  As in-"
She nodded, beaming once more.
"I've booked us both tickets leaving tomorrow evening, we would need to leave tomorrow morning to travel out to the coast and reach the port in time but it's doable."
"Jill... I don't know what to say, I mean..." 
The shock of her sudden request had thrown you.
"Just say yes Anon!" she pleaded.
"I know you have a passport because you used it as ID when I hired you, I'm paying for everything and the ship is one of those fancy ones built like a floating holiday resort."
You slumped back into your seat, overwhelmed.
"Jill, why do you want me to come?  I'm just the poolboy..."
She leaned over and kissed you on the cheek softly.
"No Anon, you're more special to me than that."
You looked over into her glowing eyes, your breath catching at what you see there.
"Come with me as my dear friend, and let's just have some fun together, away from this dreary place."
You reach up and pull her into a kiss, before finally pulling back away and answering.
"Alright then Jill, I'm in."
She gave a little squee of happiness before hopping out of the car.
"Then it's settled!  We've got to get up early tomorrow so why don't we get an early night hmm?"
Climbing out the Porsche, you walk up the drive towards the house arm in arm with her.
Something tells you that despite her insistence of an early night, you won't be getting mush sleep in before morning.
----------------------------------------

Epilogue - Poolboy No More

Early the next morning, the two of you made the long journey out of town and to the coast where you in turn boarded the cruise ship.
Jill had booked you both a four week trip out to sea, eventually returning towards the coastline further south before making its way leisurely back towards the port.
It had been a last minute booking so she hadn't arranged anything too fancy as far as the accommodation went, but the cabin that you would both be sharing for the trip was a palace compared to your trailer and certainly a cosy little hideaway for a couple who intended on spending some private time together.

You had expected the stereotypical cruise experience of course, which was mainly old and grey pensioners playing shuffleboard on the deck or passed out on sunloungers, while you and Jill stuck to your cabin and made your own entertainment.
The reality however had been so very different.
It was as Jill had said, with the ship being a giant floating resort with almost every amenity and distraction you could think of.
There were shopping malls, casinos, restaurants, pools, gyms, theatres and more.
So it turned out that the two of you spent most of your time out exploring the wonders on offer instead of hidden away under the bedsheets.
In the mornings you both rose early, heading out to the almost Olympic sized pool for a swim together, before getting some breakfast and relaxing together.
In the afternoons you went out amongst the various attractions, looking for something new, hand in hand as you enjoyed each new experience and sight.
In the evenings, you walked arm in arm to one of the many fancy restaurants or shows, or sometimes just heading up to the top deck and laying out together on a deckchair under a blanket to watch the stars above.
Not to say of course that as the evenings drew to a close you didn't return to your cabin and rutt like your lives depended on it, leading to no less than four noise complaints, a broken mattress and a threat to throw you overboard if they caught you both 'having at it' in one of the lifeboats again...
That had been Jill's idea, and she made certain that you didn't get caught the next few times you did it again afterwards.

As the first couple of weeks flew by however, there were some gradual but noticeable changes between the two of you.
The first was Jill's physique.
With the time she spent in the pool each morning she began to lose some of the extra weight she had been carrying.
She had taken the opportunity to fall back into the routines she used as a girl while training as an athlete, and although it did little to those glorious naturally wide hips of hers, you certainly felt the benefit of her more toned thighs come night time.
The other change however was to your relationship.
You had arrived on the ship as friends, both looking to just spend some time having some fun together and forgetting about the problems you had left back on shore.
The intent was to see the trip through and then part happily at the end and perhaps go your separate ways.
What began to happen however, was that you both found the time you spent together fulfilling in a way you hadn't expected.
You began to waste days that had been planned for some exciting activity on simply sitting together by the pool, just talking and getting to know one another more deeply.
Instead of dragging each other back towards the cabin at the end of the evening as quickly as possible you took your time, slowly enjoying the walk and whispering sweet nothings to each other.
By the third week you found yourself smitten with her, and she you, in a way neither had ever really experienced before.
The time you spent in bed seemed to shift from frantic pounding in the pursuit of carnal pleasure to periods of slow and intimate lovemaking.
You both began talking about what would happen after the trip came to an end, about what the two of you wanted for your respective futures, and if in fact they actually had to be separate from one another...

Then it was during the final week that something else changed.
Specifically, Jill's health.
Despite enjoying your time together happily upon the sea until now problem free, Jill began suffering from some really quite severe sea sickness.
When the normal over the counter remedies you hastily brought her didn't work, you took her to go visit the ship's doctor.
She ran some tests, and soon discovered the cause.
It was by then the last day or so of the cruise.
Which meant after some late advice, you both made your way back to shore, and back to the town you had left in what felt like a lifetime ago...
-------------------------------------

You had barely been home an hour when Chad came in, flanked by the stern form of his aunt.
Jill had called to let them know she was back home again and to ask them over.
After their falling out he had been sent off to live with his Auntie Mildred, banished from the Fearson household while Jill was away on her trip.
It had been in a smaller place across town so not exactly a different state or anything, but the look of pure relief on Chad's face when he came bursting through the door said that he might as well of been.
The look evaporated however when he caught sight of you sitting in his living room, and was quickly replaced by confusion when he couldn't spot his mother anywhere.
"Anon?" he croaked in surprise.
"What are you doing here in my house?  Where's my mom!?!"
He hadn't known you would be here.
As far as he had known, you had left town in disgrace about four weeks ago, just before his mom left for her time away.
This was going to be an interesting day...
"Hi Chad!" you say, beaming at him from your seat upon the sofa.
"So you're Anon hmm?"
Mildred, his late father's sister, had known you would be here, but this was your first meeting.
"That's me." you respond politely, rising from your seat and shaking her hand.
"Jill's just upstairs freshening up.  Could you go up and get her?" you ask.
With a curt nod, Mildred left and made her way towards the stairs.
Alone now with Chad, he turned on you.
"The fuck you doing here!?!" he seethed.
"I thought I told you to never show your face here again!"
You smile at him, in a way that both reflected your sense of perfect internal contentment and put him completely ill at ease.
"Now Chad..." you say soothingly.
"Don't go getting upset now.  Why don't you take a seat?"
You didn't really give him the chance to respond, instead grabbing him by his collar and dumping him roughly down upon the sofa.
While he sat there blinking in disbelief, you put your face right down close to his, causing him to pull back slightly.
"There's some things your mom wants to talk to you about in a minute, and it would be best for everyone, especially you, if you could just sit there like a good boy and listen."
He continued to just stare, which you took as a silent "okay".
It didn't take long for Jill and her sister in law to finally come down, the former looking uncharacteristically pensive while the latter wore the same mask of unflinching sternness that she had entered with.
After a tight hug of welcome for Jill, Chad returned dutifully to his seat, eying you cautiously.
With the two newcomers now sat waiting it was time for your announcement, or it would have been if it wasn't for Chad.
"Why is he here?" he demanded of Jill angrily, his finger pointed at you accusingly.
"You go away for a month without me with barely a word and now he shows up the day you come back?"
Any further outbursts halted as his aunt flipped him across the back of his ear, allowing Jill to actually answer.
"Anon is here because there's something I- no we, have to tell you."
She took a deep breath before continuing, while you moved to her side and kept your mouth shut for now.
"When I went away, it wasn't by myself..."
You took your cue to take her slightly shaking hand into your own.
"Anon came with me, and now we're... together."
Chad's jaw dropped, his eyes wide.
Mildred for her part simply raised an eyebrow, either being that much better at managing her surprise than her nephew or perhaps having been already partly filled in by Jill beforehand.
Jill continued, her son's protests not managing to escalate past the point of his mouth opening and closing like a suffocating fish out of water as she spoke.
"We went away as just two friends spending time together but now... we are very much in love."
You released her hand and placed your arm around her shoulder, pulling her in close.
"That's not the only reason I asked you to come here however." 
She took a little breath, shuddered in your embrace, and just let it out.
"We found out just yesterday but... I'm pregnant."
Chad's jaw stopped it's flapping and dropped back to just open again, his left eye now twitching.
"No..." he managed to mumble, before falling silent completely.
"It was a surprise to us both, believe me." you say, finally breaking your silence.
"We had no idea it was even possible, but..."
You dip your head down and plant a kiss on Jill's cheek.
"We spent all night talking about it and we both agree, it's a miracle!"
Even Mildred's unmoving expression cracked at this, shock leaking through the gaps.
In truth it had been a surprise, and after a bit of googling while still aboard the ship you had realized just how lacking your high school sex ed class had been.

While in school the faculty had chosen to handle the subject of sexual education in a very simple way.
The mostly anthro section of the senior year had been taken into the sports hall where they were given 'the talk', about safe sex, the pitfalls and dangers of trying to get it on with anyone outside of their species and so on.
The small handful of human students had been taken into a classroom by one of the sole human teachers, a rather straight laced sixty something lady called Mrs Loone.
Her lesson on safe sex had been the finer points of abstinence, how looking at a girl funny would give you herpes and how it was your duty to pick up the rest on your wedding night.
There had been no mention of relations with anthros other than the simple words - "If God wanted you to lay with animals he would have made you as one."
There had been no follow up lessons.
So you hadn't learned of the mutation that some anthros carried that allowed for compatibility with other races, of the less than 1% chance for an egg and sperm to successfully couple and create a life.
So, your first unprotected experience with Jill back in the pool that day had been all it took to do the deed.
The many times since hadn't really helped matters either...

As Chad slowly tried to recover his senses, his now accusing gaze switching between you and Jill as he tried to decide who to shout at first, you mess with him further.
"So, what do you think Chad?" you ask happily, your eyes locked with his.
"You're going to be a big brother soon!"
He seemed to visibly crumple, your words throwing him through yet another mental loop and forestalling his impending tantrum.
You weren't finished yet though.
Releasing Jill, you turn to face her, smiling warmly.
"Anon?" she asked uncertainly.
"What are you-"
There was no stopping you now though.
"Remember when I asked you to drop me off in town before coming back here earlier?"
She nodded.
"I said I had to pick up something?"
She nodded again, and gasped as you dropped to one knee.
"Jill Fearson?" you ask, your hand sinking into your pocket.
"Will you marry me?"
You flipped open the little box in your hand, revealing the modest sized stone that had taken the complete sum of your savings to buy, and held it up to her.
She stood there holding her breath, a hand covering her mouth in shock.
Mildred had raised both brows now, fully shocked by your sudden actions.
Chad's head had tilted to the side, his eyes not comprehending what they saw, his lips soundlessly mouthing the word no over and over.
Jill's eyes filled with tears as she looked down upon you, kneeling in wait of her answer.
"Anon..." she breathed.
"What about-"
You smiled.
"I've been desperately doing everything I can to get out of this town and find my future, but now that you are in my life?"
You take hold of her remaining limp hand and raise it to your lips, planting a soft kiss upon her soft fur.
"I don't want to be anywhere else but here, with you."
She let out a little sob, causing your heart to skip a beat as you feared she would turn you down.
"Yes." she whispered, before yelling it out louder again and again.
"Yes!  Yes you silly wonderful man!  Yes!"
You placed the ring upon her finger, before she jumped into your arms and nearly squeezed the life out of you.
---------------------------------------

The rest of the day was a blur.
As the reality of your impending life sank in and as you pondered what it would mean to raise a child, yours and Jill's child.
You vaguely remembered Mildred taking you to one side, offering you a job at her late brother's company in town as a means of providing for your impending family.
You found yourself entering what felt like an alternate dimension as she discretely asked if you happened to know any other humans your age looking for a lonely older cougar to love, impressed with how you had brought her formally miserable sister in law to life again.
You somehow ended up promising to set her up with one of your still single brothers...
There was one part of the day however that would stick in your memory very clearly, a part that would go up there on the trophy wall of your mind for all time.
When you sat yourself down next to the still shellshocked Chad, out of sight of the the two excitedly chattering cougars in the other room.
When you patted him on the shoulder, drawing his mortified expression to you and smiling.
When you spoke to him.
"Well Chad, I guess things are going to be changing for the two of us from now on huh?"
He stared, unblinking.
"Lets try and put our differences in the past where they belong, for your mother's sake and start fresh?"
He opened his mouth, either to utter a final word of defiance or perhaps even accept your proposal.
You didn't wait to find out which.
"From now on, you can call me Dad."
He actually screamed, and you nearly died right there laughing.
This was going to be good...

Fin~